

Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version























 







Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P. - Pooled Investment Fund- Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates 2016 L.P.  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P.

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    345 Park Avenue  
    New York, NY, 10154Phone: (212) 583-5000 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2017-01-26


Amended


$313,935,000


$313,935,000


Other


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link




	2016-12-07


New


Yet to Sell


$0


Other


06b 3C 3C.7


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 N/A Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates 2016 L.P. 
 Promoter 


 N/A Btas Associates L.L.C. 
 Promoter 


 John G. Finley 
 Executive 


 Jeffrey C. Iverson 
 Executive 


 Christopher J. James 
 Executive 


 Taylor Lauber 
 Executive 


 John A. Magliano 
 Executive 


 Deann D. Morgan 
 Executive 


 Todd Myers 
 Executive 


 Kathleen Skero 
 Executive 


 Matthew Skurbe 
 Executive 












Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P. - Who is raising money? | SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, startups and private equity companies















Who is raising money?











Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P.  Funding details


Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P. Industry: Pooled Investment FundCIK Number: 0001691248Address: 345 PARK AVENUE  NEW YORK 10154Phone number: (212) 583-5000



Latest news
Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P. raised $313,935,000 from 21 investors on 2017-01-26.



Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P. Filings

DateFiling TypeOfferedSoldRemainingMin. investmentInvest. countExemption / Exlusions
2017-01-26Amended Form DIndefinite$313,935,000Indefinite$02106b 3C 3C.7[SEC Filing]2016-12-07New Form DIndefiniteYet To SellIndefinite$0006b 3C 3C.7[SEC Filing]
Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P. raised $313,935,000 in total.



Directors and Executives of Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P.
Key People in Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016-A L.P.:

n/a Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates N/A BTAS Associates L.L.C.Deann MorganJohn FinleyJeffrey IversonMatthew SkurbeKathleen SkeroChristopher JamesJohn MaglianoTodd MyersTaylor Lauber
Similar companiesBLACKSTONE VALLEY SURGICARE ACQUISITION L P, Blackstone Real Estate CMBS Fund L.P., Blackstone Real Estate CMBS Offshore Fund Ltd., Blackstone / GSO Capital Solutions Fund LP, Blackstone Cabot Fund L.P., Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations (Alberta) Europe.1, Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations (Alberta) Fund II., Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Europe.1 L.P., Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Europe.2 L.P., Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Fund II.1 L.P., Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Fund II.2 L.P., Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Global Feeder Fund








Last visited companies: Brevan Howard Multi-Strategy Fund Ltd, Brevan Howard Multi-Strategy Fund, L.P., Brother's Keeper Feature Film Distribution, LLC, Brother's Keeper Feature Film Distribution, LLC, CA Express Fund, LLC

								© whoisraisingmoney.com
Daily updated news about investment into startups, hedge funds and private equity companies.
















10-Q: BLACKSTONE GROUP L.P. - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

21,711
+97.58
+0.45%






Nasdaq

6,423
+10.57
+0.16%






S&P 500

2,478
+0.70
+0.03%









10:44 P.M. ET


Updated
      Americans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
                                





 
10:43 P.M. ET


Updated
      These cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
                                





 
9:55 P.M. ET


Updated
      This social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
                                





 
9:55 P.M. ET


Updated
      Move over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
                                





 
9:54 P.M. ET


Updated
      This is the worst mistake people make at work
                                





 
9:54 P.M. ET


Updated
      Cities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
                                





 
9:54 P.M. ET


Updated
      What Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
                                





 
9:49 P.M. ET


Updated
      Watch out for these surprise charges at the ER
                                





 
9:49 P.M. ET


Updated
      The open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
                                





 
9:47 P.M. ET


Updated
      How an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
                                





 
9:47 P.M. ET


Updated
      Don’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
                                





 
9:46 P.M. ET


Updated
      The highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
                                





 
9:45 P.M. ET


Updated
      How to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
                                





 
9:39 P.M. ET


Updated
      Back-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
                                





 
9:39 P.M. ET


Updated
      Samsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
                                





 
9:38 P.M. ET


Updated
      The dark side of cruises
                                





 
9:37 P.M. ET


Updated
      For transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
                                





 
7:45 P.M. ET


Updated
      Scaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
                                





 
7:43 P.M. ET


                                  Facebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
                                





 
6:56 P.M. ET


                                  Facebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: BLACKSTONE GROUP L.P.
    








    By

Published: Nov 8, 2016 4:08 p.m. ET

Share


















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- ITEM 2. MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS  The following discussion and analysis should be read in conjunction with The Blackstone Group L.P.'s condensed consolidated financial statements and the related notes included in this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q.  Our Business  Blackstone is one of the largest independent managers of private capital in the world. Our business is organized into four segments:   Private Equity. We are a world leader in private equity investing, having managed seven general private equity funds, as well as three sector focused funds, since we established this business in 1987. We refer to these managed corporate private equity funds collectively as our Blackstone Capital Partners ("BCP") funds. Our Private Equity segment also includes Blackstone Tactical Opportunities ("Tactical Opportunities"), our opportunistic investment platform that invests globally across asset classes, industries and geographies, Strategic Partners Fund Solutions ("Strategic Partners"), a secondary private fund of funds business, Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution ("BTAS"), a multi-asset investment program for eligible high net worth investors offering exposure to certain of Blackstone's key illiquid investment strategies through a single commitment, and our capital markets services business ("BXCM"). We have also raised capital commitments for Blackstone Core Equity Partners ("BCEP"), which targets control-oriented investments in high-quality companies with durable businesses and seeks to offer a lower level of risk and a longer hold period than traditional private equity.  Our corporate private equity business pursues transactions throughout the world across a variety of transaction types, including large buyouts, mid-cap buyouts, buy and build platforms (which involve multiple acquisitions behind a single management team and platform) and growth equity/development projects (which involve significant minority investments in mature companies and greenfield development projects in energy and power). Tactical Opportunities seeks to capitalize on complex and dislocated market situations across asset classes, industries and geographies in a broad range of investments, including private and public securities, and instruments, where the underlying exposure may be to equity, debt, and/or real assets. Strategic Partners focuses on delivering access to a range of opportunities, leveraging its proprietary database to acquire single fund interests or complex portfolios in an efficient and timely manner.   Real Estate. Since our start in 1991, we have become a world leader in real estate investing. We have managed or continue to manage a number of global, European and Asian focused opportunistic real estate funds, several real estate debt investment vehicles, a NYSE publicly traded REIT ("BXMT") and several core+ real estate funds. In addition, we manage Blackstone Real Estate Income Trust, Inc. ("BREIT"), a non-listed REIT formed to invest primarily in stabilized income-oriented commercial real estate in the United States. We refer to our opportunistic real estate funds as our Blackstone Real Estate Partners ("BREP") funds, our real estate debt investment vehicles as our Blackstone Real Estate Debt Strategies ("BREDS") funds and our core+ real estate funds as our Blackstone Property Partners ("BPP") funds.  Our BREP funds are geographically diversified and target a broad range of "opportunistic" real estate and real estate related investments that are generally undermanaged assets with higher potential for equity appreciation. BREP has made significant investments in lodging, office buildings, shopping centers, residential, industrial and a variety of real estate operating companies.  Our BREDS vehicles target real estate debt-related investment opportunities in the public and private markets, primarily in the United States and Europe.  Table of Contents  Our BPP funds are geographically diversified and target substantially stabilized assets generating relatively stable cash flow with a focus on office, multifamily, industrial and retail assets in gateway markets.   Hedge Fund Solutions. Blackstone's Hedge Fund Solutions segment is comprised principally of Blackstone Alternative Asset Management ("BAAM"). BAAM is the world's largest discretionary allocator to hedge funds, managing a broad range of commingled and customized hedge fund of fund solutions since its inception in 1990. The Hedge Fund Solutions segment also includes investment platforms that seed new hedge fund talent, purchase ownership interests in more established hedge funds, invest in special situation opportunities, create alternative solutions in regulated structures and trade long and short public equities.   Credit. Our Credit segment consists principally of GSO Capital Partners LP ("GSO"), a global leader in managing credit-focused products within private and public debt market strategies. GSO's products include senior credit-focused funds, mezzanine funds, distressed debt funds, general credit-focused funds, registered investment companies, separately managed accounts and CLO vehicles.  We generate revenue from fees earned pursuant to contractual arrangements with funds, fund investors and fund portfolio companies (including management, transaction and monitoring fees), and from capital markets services. We invest in the funds we manage and, in most cases, receive a preferred allocation of income (i.e., a Carried Interest) or an incentive fee from an investment fund in the event that specified cumulative investment returns are achieved (generally collectively referred to as "Performance Fees"). The composition of our revenues will vary based on market conditions and the cyclicality of the different businesses in which we operate. Net investment gains and investment income generated by the Blackstone Funds, principally private equity and real estate funds, are driven by value created by our operating and strategic initiatives as well as overall market conditions. Fair values are affected by changes in the fundamentals of the portfolio company, the portfolio company's industry, the overall economy and other market conditions.  Business Environment  Blackstone's businesses are materially affected by conditions in the financial markets and economic conditions in the U.S., Europe, Asia and, to a lesser extent, elsewhere in the world.  Despite volatility and uncertainty at the outset of the third quarter following the U.K. vote to leave the European Union ("Brexit"), markets rebounded substantially in the remainder of the quarter, with most indices ending up. The S&P 500 ended the quarter up 3%, the FTSE 100 up 6%, the Euro Stoxx up 5%, the Nikkei 225 up 6%, the Hang Seng up 12% and the MSCI World up 5%.  Developments in currency markets were generally mixed in the quarter, with the U.S. dollar showing continued strength amid more evidence of improving economic growth and moderately accelerating inflation. The pound fell a further 3% versus the U.S. dollar in the third quarter, bringing it to down 12% year-to-date, while the Euro and Japanese yen both rose 1% during the quarter.  Bond markets posted modest gains during the quarter, with the Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Aggregate Index gaining 0.5%. While U.S. Treasury rates rose slightly from historic lows, investment grade credit experienced a modest gain of 1% and agency mortgage-backed securities returned 0.6%. High yield corporate bonds and emerging market debt outperformed other fixed income asset classes during the quarter with excess returns of 6% and 4%, respectively. Central banks have continued to be accommodative, holding interest rates at or near record lows. The Federal Reserve left the federal funds target rate range unchanged at a range of 0.25% to 0.50% during its July and September meetings, but has provided an upbeat outlook for the economy in both announcements, increasing the likelihood of a near-term rate hike.  Table of Contents  U.S. equity markets have performed well, with the S&P 500 and Dow reaching all-time highs during the third quarter. The overall economic outlook remains moderate, with current forecasts calling for global economic growth of 3.1% in 2016 before recovering to 3.4% in 2017. U.S. GDP growth in the third quarter was 2.9%, significantly stronger than the 1.4% pace during the second quarter. In line with the first half of the year, GDP in China is expected to be 6.6% year over year for 2016, further supporting the idea of stabilization.  The rally in oil during the first half of 2016 did not extend into the third quarter, with West Texas Intermediate Crude ("WTI") ending the quarter flat at $48.24. The quarter was somewhat volatile, with consecutive periods of rising and falling crude oil prices and weekly changes ranging from -10% to 10% for both WTI and Brent oil. Natural gas prices were down 2% during the quarter, while gasoline prices across the U.S. continued to stay low, ending the quarter at $2.22 a gallon.  The rate of corporate credit defaults remained elevated, with 130 global defaults by the end of the third quarter, the highest level since the financial crisis, driven largely by the energy sector. Overall capital markets volumes improved slightly from the second quarter, though debt issuance continued to significantly outpace equity. Global debt volume reached $5.5 trillion during the first nine months of 2016, given record low borrowing costs, while global equity volume was only $479 billion, down 28% year over year. Global mergers and acquisitions volume continued to fall during the third quarter to $753 billion, down 27% since the prior year, although the first month of the fourth quarter showed an uptick in mergers and acquisitions activity.  Global growth is projected to pick up modestly in 2017 and thereafter, driven largely by emerging market and developing economies, with ongoing uncertainty in the U.K. and Europe due to Brexit. Improvement in the U.S. economy continues slowly, buoyed by low unemployment and favorable labor market conditions, solid household spending and stronger housing activity.  Significant Transactions  On August 31, 2016, Blackstone amended and restated its revolving credit facility to, among other things, increase the amount of the revolving credit facility from $1.1 billion to $1.5 billion and to extend the maturity date of the revolving credit facility from May 29, 2019 to August 31, 2021.  On October 5, 2016, Blackstone issued ?600 million in aggregate principal amount of 1.000% senior notes maturing on October 5, 2026.  Table of Contents  Organizational Structure  The simplified diagram below depicts our current organizational structure. The diagram does not depict all of our subsidiaries, including intermediate holding companies through which certain of the subsidiaries depicted are held.  [[Image Removed: LOGO]]  Key Financial Measures and Indicators  We manage our business using traditional financial measures and key operating metrics since we believe these metrics measure the productivity of our investment activities. Our key financial measures and indicators are discussed below.  Revenues  Revenues primarily consist of management and advisory fees, performance fees, investment income, interest and dividend revenue and other. Please refer to "Part I. Item 1. Business - Incentive Arrangements / Fee Structure" in our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015 and "Critical Accounting Policies - Revenue Recognition" for additional information regarding the manner in which Base Management Fees and Performance Fees are generated.  Management and Advisory Fees, Net - Management and Advisory Fees, Net are comprised of management fees, including base management fees, transaction and other fees and advisory fees net of management fee reductions and offsets.  The Partnership earns base management fees from limited partners of funds in each of its managed funds, at a fixed percentage of assets under management, net asset value, total assets, committed capital or invested capital, or in some cases, a fixed fee. Base management fees are recognized based on contractual terms specified in the underlying investment advisory agreements.  Transaction and other fees (including monitoring fees) are fees charged directly to managed funds and portfolio companies. The investment advisory agreements generally require that the investment adviser reduce the amount of  Table of Contents  management fees payable by the limited partners to the Partnership by an amount equal to a portion of the transaction and other fees directly paid to the Partnership by the portfolio companies. We refer to these amounts as management fee reductions. The amount of the reduction varies by fund, the type of fee paid by the portfolio company and the previously incurred expenses of the fund.  Management fee offsets are reductions to management fees payable by the limited partners of the Blackstone Funds, which are granted based on the amount such limited partners reimburse the Blackstone Funds for placement fees.  Advisory fees consist of advisory retainer and transaction-based fee arrangements related to capital markets services. Advisory retainer fees are recognized when services for the transactions are complete, in accordance with terms set forth in individual agreements. Transaction-based fees are recognized when (a) there is evidence of an arrangement with a client, (b) agreed upon services have been provided, (c) fees are fixed or determinable, and  Accrued but unpaid Management and Advisory Fees, net of management fee reductions and management fee offsets, as of the reporting date are included in Accounts Receivable or Due from Affiliates in the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition. Management fees paid by limited partners to the Blackstone Funds and passed on to Blackstone are not considered affiliate revenues.  Performance Fees - Performance Fees earned on the performance of Blackstone's hedge fund structures ("Incentive Fees") are recognized based on fund performance during the period, subject to the achievement of minimum return levels, or high water marks, in accordance with the respective terms set out in each hedge fund's governing agreements. Accrued but unpaid Incentive Fees charged directly to investors in Blackstone's offshore hedge funds as of the reporting date are recorded within Due from Affiliates in the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition. Accrued but unpaid Incentive Fees on onshore funds as of the reporting date are reflected in Investments in the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition. Incentive Fees are realized at the end of a measurement period, typically annually. Once realized, such fees are not subject to clawback or reversal.  In certain fund structures, specifically in private equity, real estate and certain hedge fund solutions and credit-focused funds ("Carry Funds"), performance fees (Carried Interest) are allocated to the general partner based on cumulative fund performance to date, subject to a preferred return to limited partners. At the end of each reporting period, the Partnership calculates the Carried Interest that would be due to the Partnership for each fund, pursuant to the fund agreements, as if the fair value of the underlying investments were realized as of such date, irrespective of whether such amounts have been realized. As the fair value of underlying investments varies between reporting periods, it is necessary to make adjustments to amounts recorded as Carried Interest to reflect either (a) positive performance resulting in an increase in the Carried Interest allocated to the general partner or (b) negative performance that would cause the amount due to the Partnership to be less than the amount previously recognized as revenue, resulting in a negative adjustment to Carried Interest allocated to the general partner. In each scenario, it is necessary to calculate the Carried Interest on cumulative results compared to the Carried Interest recorded to date and make the required positive or negative adjustments. The Partnership ceases to record negative Carried Interest allocations once previously recognized Carried Interest allocations for such fund have been fully reversed. The Partnership is not obligated to pay guaranteed returns or hurdles, and therefore, cannot have negative Carried Interest over the life of a fund. Accrued but unpaid Carried Interest as of the reporting date is reflected in Investments in the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition.  Carried Interest is realized when an underlying investment is profitably disposed of and the fund's cumulative returns are in excess of the preferred return or, in limited instances, after certain thresholds for return of capital are met. Carried Interest is subject to clawback to the extent that the Carried Interest received to date exceeds the amount due to Blackstone based on cumulative results. As such, the accrual for potential repayment of previously received Carried Interest, which is a component of Due to Affiliates, represents all amounts previously distributed to  Table of Contents  Blackstone Holdings and non-controlling interest holders that would need to be repaid to the Blackstone Funds if the Blackstone Carry Funds were to be liquidated based on the current fair value of the underlying funds' investments as of the reporting date. The actual clawback liability, however, generally does not become realized until the end of a fund's life except for certain funds, including certain Blackstone real estate funds, multi-asset class investment funds and credit-focused funds, which may have an interim clawback liability.  Investment Income (Loss) - Investment Income (Loss) represents the unrealized and realized gains and losses on the Partnership's principal investments, including its investments in Blackstone Funds that are not consolidated, its equity method investments, and other principal investments. Investment Income  Interest and Dividend Revenue - Interest and Dividend Revenue comprises primarily interest and dividend income earned on principal investments held by Blackstone.  Other Revenue - Other Revenue consists of miscellaneous income and foreign exchange gains and losses arising on transactions denominated in currencies other than U.S. dollars.  Expenses  Compensation and Benefits - Compensation - Compensation and Benefits consists of  Compensation and Benefits - Performance Fee - Performance Fee Compensation consists of Carried Interest (which may be distributed in cash or in-kind) and Incentive Fee allocations, and may in future periods also include allocations of investment income from Blackstone's firm investments, to employees and senior managing directors participating in certain profit sharing initiatives. Such compensation expense is subject to both positive and negative adjustments. Unlike Carried Interest and Incentive Fees, compensation expense is based on the performance of individual investments held by a fund rather than on a fund by fund basis. Compensation received from advisory clients in the form of securities of such clients may also be allocated to employees and senior managing directors.  Other Operating Expenses - Other Operating Expenses represents general and administrative expenses including interest expense, occupancy and equipment expenses and other expenses, which consist principally of professional fees, public company costs, travel and related expenses, communications and information services and depreciation and amortization.  Fund Expenses - The expenses of our consolidated Blackstone Funds consist primarily of interest expense, professional fees and other third party expenses.  Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities  Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities represent the component of Partners' Capital in consolidated Blackstone Funds held by third party investors and employees. The percentage interests held by third parties and  Table of Contents  employees is adjusted for general partner allocations and by subscriptions and redemptions in funds of hedge funds and certain credit-focused funds which occur during the reporting period. In addition, all non-controlling interests in consolidated Blackstone Funds are attributed a share of income (loss) arising from the respective funds and a share of other comprehensive income, if applicable. Income (Loss) is allocated to non-controlling interests in consolidated entities based on the relative ownership interests of third party investors and employees after considering any contractual arrangements that govern the allocation of income (loss) such as fees allocable to The Blackstone Group L.P.  Redeemable Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities  Non-controlling interests related to funds of hedge funds are subject to annual, semi-annual or quarterly redemption by investors in these funds following the expiration of a specified period of time, or may be withdrawn subject to a redemption fee during the period when capital may not be withdrawn. As limited partners in these types of funds have been granted redemption rights, amounts relating to third party interests in such consolidated funds are presented as Redeemable Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities within the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition. When redeemable amounts become legally payable to investors, they are classified as a liability and included in Accounts Payable, Accrued Expenses and Other Liabilities in the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition. For all consolidated funds in which redemption rights have not been granted, non-controlling interests are presented within Partners' Capital in the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition as Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities.  Non-Controlling Interests in Blackstone Holdings  Non-Controlling Interests in Blackstone Holdings represent the component of Partners' Capital in the consolidated Blackstone Holdings Partnerships held by Blackstone personnel and others who are limited partners of the Blackstone Holdings Partnerships.  Certain costs and expenses are borne directly by the Holdings Partnerships. Income (Loss), excluding those costs directly borne by and attributable to the Holdings Partnerships, is attributable to Non-Controlling Interests in Blackstone Holdings. This residual attribution is based on the year to date average percentage of Blackstone Holdings Partnership Units held by Blackstone personnel and others who are limited partners of the Blackstone Holdings Partnerships.  Income Taxes  The Blackstone Holdings Partnerships and certain of their subsidiaries operate in the U.S. as partnerships for U.S. federal income tax purposes and generally as corporate entities in non-U.S. jurisdictions. Accordingly, these entities in some cases are subject to New York City unincorporated business taxes or non-U.S. income taxes. In addition, certain of the wholly owned subsidiaries of the Partnership and the Blackstone Holdings Partnerships will be subject to federal, state and local corporate income taxes at the entity level and the related tax provision attributable to the Partnership's share of this income tax is reflected in the Condensed Consolidated Financial Statements.  Income taxes are accounted for using the asset and liability method of accounting. Under this method, deferred tax assets and liabilities are recognized for the expected future tax consequences of differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities and their respective tax basis, using tax rates in effect for the year in which the differences are expected to reverse. The effect on deferred assets and liabilities of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period when the change is enacted. Deferred tax assets are reduced by a valuation allowance when it is more likely than not that some portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized. Current and deferred tax liabilities are recorded within Accounts Payable, Accrued Expenses and Other Liabilities in the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition.  Table of Contents  Blackstone uses the flow-through method to account for investment tax credits. Under this method, the investment tax credits are recognized as a reduction to income tax expense.  Blackstone analyzes its tax filing positions in all of the U.S. federal, state, local and foreign tax jurisdictions where it is required to file income tax returns, as well as for all open tax years in these jurisdictions. Blackstone records uncertain tax positions on the basis of a two-step process: (a) a determination is made whether it is more likely than not that the tax positions will be sustained based on the technical merits of the position and (b) those tax positions that meet the more-likely-than-not threshold are recognized as the largest amount of tax benefit that is greater than 50 percent likely to be realized upon ultimate settlement with the related tax authority. Blackstone recognizes accrued interest and penalties related to uncertain tax positions in General, Administrative, and Other expenses within the Condensed Consolidated Statements of Operations.  There remains some uncertainty regarding Blackstone's future taxation levels. Over the past several years, a number of legislative and administrative proposals to change the taxation of Carried Interest have been introduced and, in certain cases, have been passed by the U.S. House of Representatives that would have, in general, treated income and gains, including gain on sale, . . .  Nov 08, 2016  (c) 1995-2016 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch




















Most Popular





Coca-Cola to replace Coke Zero in U.S.





If you can buy only one stock or ETF, make it this one





Stock market ends at record on robust earnings as Fed issues policy update





The Apple Car could run traditional automakers off the road





How to Fix Wall Street, and Bankers' Pay




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 






















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



U.S. Economy


U.S. Politics


Earnings


Sales


Aerospace


Ice




Markets


Production


Iraq


Russia


Oil


United Kingdom




Europe


European Markets


London Markets


Health Care


Income


Insurance






People in the news



Jones, Edward


Trump, Donald


Woods, Tiger


Buffett, Warren


Putnam, George


Clinton, Bill




Obama, Barack


Putin, Vladimir


Tillerson, Rex


Washington, George


Ryan, James


Walker, David




West, David


Williams, James


Gray, John


Clooney, George


Cruise, Tom


Jolie, Angelina






Companies in the news



Northrop Grumman Corp.


International Data Group


New York Mercantile Exchange


American International Group


Health Care Insurance


Miners




Metal Exchange


Target Corp.


United National


Performance


News Corp.


Jones




Oppenheimer


International Industries


Transport Service


Capital One Financial


Apple Inc.


eBay Inc.






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


European Union


OPEC


Education Department


Transportation Department


European Central Bank




Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Congress


Public Service Commission


Securities and Exchange Commission


Baseball


Nasdaq Stock Market




Consumers Union


World Bank


Council on Foreign Relations


Security Council


Senate


Boston College












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




11:04 PM EDT
July 26, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:44pAmericans in this field have the highest rate of divorce by age 30
10:44pThese cash-strapped couples want total strangers to pay for their weddings
9:56pThis social network ranks as the worst for young people’s mental health (it’s not Facebook)
9:55pMove over, breathalyzers; ‘textalyzers’ could be used on drivers’ phones 
9:55pThis is the worst mistake people make at work
9:54pCities to move to if you want to work in tech — NOT including San Francisco
9:54pWhat Donald Trump’s battle of wills with Jeff Sessions teaches you about a difficult boss
9:50pWatch out for these surprise charges at the ER
9:49pThe open road or the open skies? Millennials choose the former...
9:48pHow an online wedding registry in my name appeared out of thin air
9:47pDon’t have a college degree? These are the industries with the best-paid jobs
9:46pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
9:46pHow to teach your kids to be better with money than you are
9:40pBack-to-school shopping goes mainstream with deals on eyewear, fitness apparel and kitchen appliances
9:39pSamsung posts record profits on back of strong Galaxy S8 sales
9:39pThe dark side of cruises
9:37pFor transgender Americans, workplace discrimination isn’t limited to the military
7:46pScaramucci on Washington back stabbers: ‘I’m more of a front-stabbing person’
7:43pFacebook keeps warning about growth, but growth doesn’t stop
6:56pFacebook heads toward $500 billion market cap after earnings
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,711.01

+97.58
+0.45%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,422.75

+10.57
+0.16%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.83

+0.70
+0.03%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates  n/a - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates  n/a
Check out list of companies and businesses related to Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates  n/a. Find out Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates  n/a address and contact details. View other people related to Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates  n/a - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

345 Park Avenue  New York 10154 NY




Companies related to Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates  n/a
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001691365Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016 L.P.345 PARK AVENUE  NEW YORK 10154




Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates  n/a on the Web
Persons related to Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates  n/a - Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016 L.P.NamePositionCityN/A  BTAS Associates L.L.C.New YorkJames  ChristopherNew YorkMorgan  DeannNew YorkIverson  JeffreyNew YorkMagliano  JohnNew YorkFinley  JohnNew YorkSkero  KathleenNew YorkSkurbe  MatthewNew YorkBlackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates   n/aNew YorkBlackstone Total Alternatives Solution Associates   n/aNew YorkLauber  TaylorNew YorkMyers  ToddNew York












 






         
	Douglas Krupa
    

9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6





Our People
We believe that intellectual capital is critical to providing innovative solutions and, ultimately, having a positive economic impact.



 





 View Full List
Douglas Krupa
Principal

                    Private Wealth Solutions — New York
                


                Douglas Krupa is a Principal in the Private Wealth Solutions group. Since joining Blackstone, Mr. Krupa has worked on the development and structuring of private and registered offerings for high net worth investors including Blackstone Total Alternatives Solutions (BTAS) and Blackstone Real Estate Income Trust (BREIT).Before joining Blackstone in 2011, Mr. Krupa worked with Legg Mason, Inc., as a Product Manager, where he was responsible for product positioning, competitive intelligence and product development across all equity and alternative strategies. Prior to that, Mr. Krupa spent 7 years in portfolio specialist and sales roles with Citigroup Asset Management and UBS Painewebber.Mr. Krupa received a BS in Management from the State University of New York at Geneseo and is a CFA Charterholder.
            














Quick Links






Explore Blackstone






Get in Touch
































© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)
Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer



プライバシー・ポリシー  | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号加入協会/日本証券業協会　一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会




×
Contact UsGeneralFor office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000Email Alerts & Investor RelationsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.
Investor Relations Contact InformationUS: +1 888-756-8443International: +1 646-313-6590BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com Media ContactsFor media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.



Cookie Information and Consent RequestBlackstone Cookie PolicyThis website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.
Learn More Continue 



×
Stay up-to-dateEmail AlertsTo receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.
           
 email address (required)


 first name (required)


 last name (required)

company name
job title

Byron Wien Market Commentary
                

Blackstone Press Releases
                



   Submit
          
    
         
	Overview
    


















9d4b21c6-35a8-4ce7-97b5-772a310620b6






The Firm
Blackstone is one of the world’s leading investment firms





Who We Are

Our investments are designed to preserve and grow our limited partners’ capital, provide financial security for millions of retirees, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional and individual investors, and contribute to overall economic growth.
Blackstone is one of the world’s leading investment firms. We seek to create positive economic impact and long-term value for our investors, the companies we invest in, and the communities in which we work. We do this by using extraordinary people and flexible capital to help companies solve problems. The firm was founded in 1985 by Stephen A. Schwarzman, our Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, and Peter G. Peterson, who retired as Senior Chairman in 2008.
Thirty years later, we are a firm of more than 2,200 employees in more than 20 offices worldwide. Our portfolio companies employ more than 511,000 people across the globe.








				Mondays at Blackstone
			



















UNLOCKING VALUE,  Securing Futures  At Blackstone, we apply our capabilities as a leading global investment firm to deliver solutions, unlock value and propel growth. The capital we deploy on behalf of our investors fuels the development of businesses and communities. The investments we make are the wellsprings of future opportunity. Through this work, we seek to ensure a secure retirement for millions. 


DIVERSE AND Global  The solutions we provide reflect insights generated by our diverse, global business platform, which encompasses private equity and real estate funds, hedge fund solutions, and credit funds. We have built the firm on a strong foundation of intellectual and financial capital. We focus on attracting exceptionally talented people and on creating an atmosphere that rewards initiative, independent thinking, and integrity. Our solid financial base, including strong capital, ensures our capacity to deliver on our commitments. 








 
Our People

The deep expertise of the Blackstone team gives us a base of intellectual capital on which to draw.



 

Our Scope
Our businesses are diversified across a wide spectrum of regions, industries, and asset classes, giving us the expertise, access to resources and critical mass to take advantage of investment opportunities on a global scale.




 
Our Performance
Our performance is characterized by a record of superior risk-adjusted returns across a broad and expanding range of asset classes and through all types of economic conditions.






 $371billion
Assets Under Management
*As of June 30, 2017




“ “Blackstone has always been managed with a perspective of achieving successful growth over the long-term… Our management has consistently sought to focus on the best outcomes for our businesses and investments over a period of years rather than on the short-term impact.”   - Blackstone Prospectus, June 2007   













In 1985 Blackstone opened its doors with a staff of four, including the two founders, Peter G. Peterson and Stephen A. Schwarzman, and a balance sheet of $400,000. From these early beginnings, besides big dreams, the founders have held these core beliefs:
     1   In an environment of ever larger firms, the most gifted would desire a more personal setting and would join Blackstone to create exciting new businesses in their fields of expertise.
            2   In a world of giant organizations    with a broad array of services, there was room for a specialized firm with the highest levels of professionalism and integrity, and senior-level attention to clients and relationships.        3   In contrast to the prevailing philosophy  of “other people’s money,” the firm would always put significant amounts of its own money in the investments it made.
            4   We will consistently strive to achieve  superior performance through innovation, uniqueness and excellence.        5  Above all else our people — their creativity,   imagination, dedication, teamwork and integrity — will be our key assets.
        





$332.7
 $92.0
 $91.6
 $67.8
 $81.3
 2Q '15
        $356.3
 $99.7
 $103.2
 $68.6
 $84.7
 2Q '16
        $371.1
 $100.0
 $104.0
 $72.5
 $94.5
 2Q '17
        





Created with Highcharts 4.1.9















































$332.7


$356.3


$371.1





$92.0




$99.7




$100.0






$91.6




$103.2




$104.0






$67.8




$68.6




$72.5






$81.3




$84.7




$94.5






2Q '15




2Q '16




2Q '17

















$371 billion


Assets Under Management




 


Private Equity


A global leader in traditional buyout, growth
equity, special situations and secondary investing



 


Real Estate


One of the world’s largest real estate
investors with a dominant platform in both equity
and debt



 


Hedge Fund Solutions


The world’s largest discretionary hedge fund
investor



 


Credit


Leading manager with a diverse credit portfolio
spanning CLOs, leveraged lending, senior debt,
mezzanine and rescue financing







 30years




 Today, 30 years since the founding of the firm, we still run the firm in the same way. 
 
That means thinking about the implications of every decision – from investments to growth initiatives, risk management to team building – in terms of years and decades rather than just months or quarters.






 





Leadership
We believe that intellectual capital is critical to providing innovative solutions and, ultimately, having a positive economic impact.
Over the years, we have been fortunate to attract some of the most talented professionals in our industry. Our people are our most valuable asset – they are skilled problem solvers that believe challenges can be opportunities.
The extensive experience, talent and accomplishments of the Blackstone team give us a base of intellectual capital that is second to none.

*Member of Blackstone's Board of Directors





Stephen A. Schwarzman*
Chairman, CEO & Co-Founder





Stephen A. Schwarzman is Chairman, CEO and Co-Founder of Blackstone. Mr. Schwarzman has been involved in all phases of the firm’s development since its founding in 1985. The firm is a leading global asset manager with $371 billion Assets Under Management (as of June 30, 2017). 
Mr. Schwarzman is an active philanthropist with a history of supporting education and schools. Whether in business or in philanthropy, he has always attempted to tackle big problems and find transformative solutions. In 2015, Mr. Schwarzman donated $150 million to Yale University to establish the Schwarzman Center, a first-of-its-kind campus center in Yale’s historic “Commons” building. In 2013, he founded an international scholarship program, “Schwarzman Scholars,” at Tsinghua University in Beijing to educate future leaders about China. At $450 million, the program is modeled on the Rhodes Scholarship and is the single largest philanthropic effort in China’s history coming largely from international donors. Mr. Schwarzman currently maintains his position as Co-Chair of the Board of Trustees of Schwarzman Scholars. In 2007, Mr. Schwarzman donated $100 million to the New York Public Library on whose board he serves. 
Mr. Schwarzman is a member of The Council on Foreign Relations, The Business Council, The Business Roundtable, and The International Business Council of the World Economic Forum. He is co-chair of the Partnership for New York City and serves on the boards of The Asia Society and New York-Presbyterian Hospital, as well as on The Advisory Board of the School of Economics and Management at Tsinghua University, Beijing. He is a Trustee of The Frick Collection in New York City and Chairman Emeritus of the Board of Directors of The John F. Kennedy Center for the Performing Arts. In 2007, Mr. Schwarzman was included in TIME’s “100 Most Influential People.” In 2016, he topped Forbes Magazine’s list of the most influential people in finance. The Republic of France has awarded Mr. Schwarzman both the Légion d'Honneur and the Ordre des Arts et des Letters at the Commandeur level.  Mr. Schwarzman is one of the only Americans to receive both awards recognizing significant contributions to France.
He is also the Chairman of the President’s Strategic and Policy Forum, which is charged with providing direct input to the President of the United States from business leaders through a non-partisan, non-bureaucratic exchange of ideas. 
Mr. Schwarzman holds a B.A. from Yale University and an M.B.A. from Harvard Business School. He has served as an adjunct professor at the Yale School of Management and on the Harvard Business School Board of Dean’s Advisors.


Videos






				A Spirit of Entrepreneurship: Stephen A. Schwarzman, Blackstone's CEO, Chairman and Co-Founder
			









				Mondays at Blackstone
			












Hamilton E. James*
President & Chief Operating Officer





 Hamilton (“Tony”) E. James is President, Chief Operating Officer of Blackstone, and a member of the board of directors of our general partner, Blackstone Group Management L.L.C. He is also a member of Blackstone’s Management  Committee and sits on each of the firm’s investment committees.


Prior to joining Blackstone Mr. James was Chairman of Global Investment Banking and Private Equity at Credit Suisse First Boston and a member of the Executive Board. Prior to the acquisition of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette by Credit Suisse First Boston in 2000, Mr. James was the Chairman of DLJ’s Banking Group, responsible for all the firm’s investment banking and merchant banking activities. Mr. James joined DLJ in 1975 as an Investment Banking associate. He became head of DLJ’s global M&A group in 1982, founded DLJ Merchant Banking, Inc. in 1985, and was named Chairman of the Banking Group in 1995. He is a Director of Costco Wholesale Corporation and has served on a number of other corporate Boards.


Mr. James is a Trustee and member of The Executive Committee of The Second Stage Theatre, Trustee of The Metropolitan Museum of Art, Member of the Center for American Progress Board of Trustees, Vice Chairman of Trout Unlimited’s Coldwater Conservation Fund, Trustee of Woods Hole Oceanographic, Trustee of Wildlife Conservation Society, Advisory Board member of The Montana Land Reliance, and Chairman Emeritus of the Board of Trustees of American Ballet Theatre. He is also a former member of the President’s Export Council – Subcommittee on Technology & Competitiveness.

In 2016, Mr. James co-authored Rescuing Retirement, a book proposing a solution to America’s looming retirement crisis.


Mr. James graduated magna cum laude with a BA from Harvard College in 1973 and was a John Harvard Scholar. He earned an MBA with high distinction from the Harvard Business School and graduated as a Baker Scholar in 1975.



Videos






				Blackstone President Tony James on Creating Value for Investors
			













J. Tomilson Hill*
Vice Chairman, President & Chief Executive Officer of Blackstone Alternative Asset Management





J. Tomilson Hill is President and Chief Executive Officer of the Hedge Fund Solutions group, Vice Chairman of Blackstone and a member of the board of directors of our general partner. Mr. Hill was elected to the board of directors of our general partner effective March 20, 2007. He also sits on the firm’s Management Committee. Mr. Hill previously served as Co-Head of the Corporate and Mergers and Acquisitions Advisory group before assuming his role as Chief Executive Officer of BAAM. In his current capacity, Mr. Hill is responsible for overseeing the day-to-day activities of the group, including investment management, client relationships, product development, marketing, operations and administration.  He is a member of the board of directors of Patria Investment Limited. 
Before joining Blackstone in 1993, Mr. Hill began his career at First Boston, later becoming one of the Co-Founders of its Mergers & Acquisitions Department. After running the Mergers & Acquisitions Department at Smith Barney, he joined Lehman Brothers as a partner in 1982, serving as Co-Head and subsequently Head of Investment Banking. Later, he served as Co-Chief Executive Officer of Lehman Brothers and Co-President and Co-COO of Shearson Lehman Brothers Holding Inc. 
Mr. Hill is a graduate of Harvard College and the Harvard Business School. He is a member of the Council on Foreign Relations where he is Chairman Emeritus of the Investment Committee and serves on the Council’s board of directors, and is a member of the board of directors of Lincoln Center Theater, where he is Chairman Emeritus. He is Chairman Emeritus of the Hirshhorn Museum and Sculpture Garden in Washington, D.C.  He serves on the Investment Committee of the Smithsonian Institution.  He currently serves on the board of The Metropolitan Museum of Art, the Telluride Foundation, the Advantage Testing Foundation, the Friends of the High Line, and of Our Lady Queen of Angels School, a parochial school (K-8th grade) in Spanish Harlem. He is a member of the Advisory Board of Christie’s and a member of the board of directors of First Eagle Investment Management, Hamilton Insurance Group, Limited and Advantage Testing, Inc.


Videos






				A Message from Tom Hill, President and CEO of BAAM
			












Joseph Baratta
Global Head of Private Equity





 Joseph Baratta is Global Head of Private Equity and a member of the firm's Management Committee. Since joining Blackstone in 1998, Mr. Baratta has been involved in the execution of Blackstone’s investments in Universal Orlando, Nycomed Pharmaceuticals, Houghton Mifflin, Spirit Group and was responsible for Blackstone's investments in Seaworld Parks and Entertainment, Merlin Entertainments Group, Center Parcs, Tragus Group, Southern Cross and ICS Group. In 2001, Mr. Baratta moved to London to help establish Blackstone’s corporate private equity business in Europe.
 
Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Baratta was with Tinicum Incorporated, and McCown De Leeuw & Company. Mr. Baratta also worked at Morgan Stanley in its mergers and acquisitions department.
 
Mr. Baratta graduated magna cum laude from Georgetown University where he currently serves on the University's Board of Regents and the Advisory Board of the McDonough School of Business. He serves as a director of Seaworld Parks and Entertainment and Penn Engineering and formerly on the boards of current Blackstone portfolio companies Merlin Entertainments Group and Center Parcs plc. He is also a trustee of both the Tate Foundation and the Private Equity Foundation.



Videos






				Blackstone Case Study: Merlin Entertainments
			









				A Message from Joe Baratta, Global Head of Private Equity
			












David S. Blitzer
Senior Managing Director & Head of Tactical Opportunities





David S. Blitzer is a Senior Managing Director & Head of the Tactical Opportunities group.  Mr. Blitzer is based in New York, having established Blackstone’s corporate private equity investment efforts in Europe.
Since joining Blackstone in 1991, Mr. Blitzer has been involved in the execution of Blackstone’s investments in Spirit Group, SULO, Allied Waste, Aspen Insurance Holdings, Houghton Mifflin, Universal Orlando, Centerplate, Cadillac Fairview, Edward J. DeBartolo Corporation, Southern Cross, NHP, Orangina, and United Biscuits.
Mr. Blitzer graduated magna cum laude from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania. Mr. Blitzer serves as a Director of United Biscuits and Jack Wolfskin.







David Calhoun
Senior Managing Director,  Private Equity





David L. Calhoun is a Senior Managing Director and Head of Private Equity Portfolio Operations of Blackstone and a Member of Blackstone’s Management Committee.
Mr. Calhoun joined Blackstone in January of 2014 and oversees a team within the portfolio operations group focused on creating and driving added value initiatives with Blackstone portfolio company CEOs. 
Since the beginning of 2014, Mr. Calhoun serves as Executive Chairman of the Board for Nielsen, a company he joined in 2006 as Chief Executive Officer, shortly after it was acquired by a consortium of private equity investors including Blackstone. Throughout his seven years’ tenure, Mr. Calhoun led Nielsen’s transformation into a leading global information and measurement company listed on the New York Stock Exchange (NLSN) and Standard & Poor’s 500 Index.
Before Nielsen, Mr. Calhoun served as Vice Chairman of The General Electric Company and President and Chief Executive Officer of GE Infrastructure, the company’s largest business unit. During his distinguished twenty-six year tenure at GE, Mr. Calhoun ran multiple business units, including GE Lighting, GE Employers Reinsurance Co., GE Aircraft Engines, and GE Transportation (Aircraft and Rail).  Earlier in his career at GE, he held a wide range of operating, finance, and marketing roles across the company, including within GE Plastics and GE Capital.
In addition to Nielsen, Mr. Calhoun also serves on the Board of Directors of The Boeing Company and Caterpillar. He is the co-author with Rick Kash of the book “How Companies Win.”  Mr. Calhoun is a 1979 graduate of Virginia Tech, and is a member of Virginia Tech’s Pamplin Advisory Council, which advises the university on student and alumni issues.








Bennett Goodman*
Senior Managing Director & Co-founder of GSO Capital Partners





 Bennett Goodman is a Co-Founder of GSO Capital Partners (“GSO”) and Senior Managing Director of Blackstone. He is a member of the Board of Directors of Blackstone and sits on the firm’s Management Committee.
 
Since joining Blackstone in 2008, Mr. Goodman focuses on the management of GSO, which is Blackstone’s credit investment platform with over $70 billion of assets under management in various direct lending strategies, leveraged loan vehicles and distressed investment funds.
 
Before co-founding GSO in 2005, Mr. Goodman was the Managing Partner of the Alternative Capital Division of Credit Suisse. Mr. Goodman joined Credit Suisse in November 2000 when they acquired Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette ("DLJ") where he was Global Head of Leveraged Finance. Mr. Goodman joined DLJ in February of 1988 as the founder of the High Yield Capital Markets Group. Prior to joining DLJ, Mr. Goodman worked in the high yield business at Drexel Burnham Lambert from 1984 to 1988.
 
Mr. Goodman graduated from Lafayette College and the Harvard Business School. He currently sits on the board of Lincoln Center and the Central Park Conservancy. He received Institutional Investor’s 2012 Money Manager of The Year Award and the 2004 Lifetime Achievement Award from Euromoney Magazine for his career achievements in the global capital markets.



Videos






				A Message from Bennett Goodman, Co-Founder of GSO
			












Jonathan D. Gray*
Global Head of Real Estate





 Jonathan D. Gray is Global Head of Real Estate and a member of the board of directors of Blackstone. He also sits on the firm’s Management Committee.
 
Since joining Blackstone in 1992, Mr. Gray has helped build the largest real estate platform in the world with $93 billion in investor capital under management. Blackstone’s portfolio includes hotel, office, retail, industrial and residential properties in the U.S., Europe, Asia and Latin America.
 
Mr. Gray currently serves as Chairman of the Board of Hilton Worldwide and is a board member of Brixmor Properties. He is also Chairman of the Board of Harlem Village Academies and a board member of Trinity School. Mr. Gray and his wife, Mindy, established the Basser Center for BRCA at the University of Pennsylvania School of Medicine focused on the prevention and treatment of certain genetically caused cancers.
 
Mr. Gray received a BS in Economics from the Wharton School, as well as a BA in English from the College of Arts and Sciences at the University of Pennsylvania, where he graduated magna cum laude and was elected to Phi Beta Kappa.



Videos






				A Message from Jon Gray, Global Head of Real Estate
			









				Blackstone Real Estate Strategy
			












Joan Solotar
Senior Managing Director & Head of Multi-Asset Investing & External Relations





 Joan Solotar is a Senior Managing Director & Head of Multi-Asset Investing & External Relations at Blackstone and a member of the firm’s Management Committee.  Ms. Solotar has management responsibility for shareholder relations and public affairs and also guides the firm on analyzing strategic development opportunities.


Before joining Blackstone in 2007, Ms. Solotar was with Bank of America Securities where she was a Managing Director and Head of Equity Research.  She started her career in equity research at The First Boston Corporation and, prior to joining Bank of America, was part of the financial services team at Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette, and later with CSFB as a Managing Director.  Ms. Solotar was consistently ranked highly in the Brokers and Asset Management category of the Institutional Investor “All-America Research Team” and the Greenwich Survey of portfolio managers. She also served as Chairperson of the Research Committee for the Securities Industry Association and is currently serving on the Advisory Board of Evine.


Ms. Solotar Chairs the Board of Directors of Blackstone’s Charitable Foundation.  She is also Chairman of the Board of Trustees of the East Harlem Tutorial Program and the East Harlem Scholars Academy.  She is the author of a Harvard Business Review article entitled “Truths for our Daughters,” as well as “Truths from My Daughter.”

Ms. Solotar received a B.S. in Management Information Systems from the State University of New York at Albany and an M.B.A. in Finance from New York University.








Michael Chae
Senior Managing Director & Chief Financial Officer





Michael S. Chae is a Senior Managing Director and the Chief Financial Officer of Blackstone. Mr. Chae has management responsibility over the firm’s global finance, treasury, technology, and corporate development functions. 
Since joining Blackstone in 1997, Mr. Chae has served in a broad range of leadership roles including Head of International Private Equity, Head of Private Equity for Asia/Pacific, and overseeing Private Equity investments in various sectors as well as the investment process for the Tactical Opportunities fund. Mr. Chae led or was involved in numerous Blackstone investments over that time period. 
Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Chae worked at The Carlyle Group, L.P. and prior to that with Dillon, Read & Co. 
Mr. Chae graduated magna cum laude with an AB from Harvard College, and received an MPhil in International Relations from Cambridge University and a JD from Yale Law School. 
He has served on numerous boards of private and publicly traded portfolio companies. Mr. Chae is a member of the Board of Trustees of the Lawrenceville School and Chairman of its Investment Committee, and a member of the Council on Foreign Relations and the Board of Trustees of the Asia Society.








John G. Finley
Senior Managing Director & Chief Legal Officer





 John G. Finley, a Senior Managing Director, is the firm’s Chief Legal Officer.
 
Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Finley had been a partner with Simpson Thacher & Bartlett for 22 years where he was most recently a member of that law firm's Executive Committee and Head of Global M&A.
 
Mr. Finley is a member of the Advisory Board of the Harvard Law School Program on Corporate Governance and a Trustee of the Jewish Board of Family and Children Services. He is also a guest lecturer at Harvard Law School. He has served on the Committee of Securities Regulation of the New York State Bar Association and the Board of Advisors of the Knight-Bagehot Fellowship in Economics and Business Journalism at Columbia University. He has also served as Chairman of the Annual International Mergers & Acquisitions Conference of the International Bar Association.
 
Mr. Finley has a BS in Economics, summa cum laude, from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania (1978), a BA in History, summa cum laude, from the College of Arts and Sciences of the University of Pennsylvania (1978), and a JD, cum laude, from Harvard Law School (1981).








James W. Breyer*
Founder and CEO of Breyer Capital





James W. Breyer is a member of the board of directors of our general partner.  Mr. Breyer is the Founder and Chief Executive Officer of Breyer Capital, a global venture capital fund. Mr. Breyer has been an investor in over 30 public and private consumer internet, media and technology companies, many of which have completed public offerings or successful mergers. He served as Partner at Accel Partners from 1990 to 2016 and Managing Partner from 1995 to 2011. Mr. Breyer has been an active investor in China for over a decade and is lead outside sponsor, partner and investor in IDG China Capital Funds.
Mr. Breyer currently serves on the board of directors of Twenty-First Century Fox, Inc. and Circle Internet Financial, Inc. and previously served on the board of directors of Facebook, Inc. from 2005 to 2013, Dell, Inc. from 2009 to 2013, and Wal-Mart Stores, Inc. from 2001 to 2013, as well as a number of other prominent technology and media companies.
Mr. Breyer has been ranked #1 on Forbes’ Midas List of top technology investors multiple times and is former Chairman of the National Venture Capital Association and former President of the Western Association of Venture Capitalists. Mr. Breyer is a fellow of the Harvard Corporation, member of the Advisory Board of Stanford University School of Engineering, Trustee of the Metropolitan Museum of Art, Trustee of the San Francisco Museum of Modern Art, member of the Council on Foreign Relations, Chairman of the Advisory Board of the Tsinghua University School of Economics and Management in Beijing, and in 2005 was named an Honorary Professor at the 1,000 year-old Yuelu Academy at Hunan University.
Mr. Breyer graduated from Stanford University with a BS degree and from Harvard University with an MBA, where he was named a Baker Scholar.







Peter T. Grauer*
Chairman, Bloomberg L.P. 





Peter T. Grauer is a member of the board of directors of our general partner.  Mr. Grauer is Chairman of Bloomberg L.P., a global financial information and media company. A board member of Bloomberg since 1996, he became Chairman in 2001, succeeding Michael R. Bloomberg, and then Chairman, President and CEO a year later.
From 2000 to 2002, he was managing director and senior partner of Credit Suisse First Boston, founding both DLJ Merchant Banking Partners and DLJ Investment Partners. He was managing director of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette from 1992 until CSFB acquired it in 2000.
Mr. Grauer is lead director of DaVita Health Care Partners, Inc, and Senior Independent Non-Executive Director of Glencore. He is a member of the Business Council, the Asia Business Council, the International Business Council of the World Economic Forum, and Founding Chairman of the WEF Community of Chairmen. He is President of the Inner City Scholarship Fund Board of Trustees, Chairman of the Rockefeller Finance & Operations Committee, Chair of the College Advising Corps, and board member of Room to Read and the Prostate Cancer Foundation. He is Founding U.S. Chair of the 30% Club, a Member of the Advisory Council of Out on the Street, and the McKinsey Advisory Council.







Richard Jenrette*
Retired Chairman and CEO, The Equitable Life Assurance Society; Founder, Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette, Inc.





 Richard Jenrette is a member of the board of directors of our general partner.
 
Mr. Jenrette is the retired former Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of The Equitable Companies Incorporated and the co-founder and retired Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette, Inc.
 
He is also a former Chairman of The Securities Industry Association and has served in the past as a director or trustee of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Advanced Micro Devices Inc., the American Stock Exchange, The Rockefeller Foundation, The Duke Endowment, the University of North Carolina, New York University and The National Trust for Historic Preservation.









Rochelle B. Lazarus*
Chairman Emeritus & Former Chief Executive Officer, Ogilvy & Mather Worldwide





 Rochelle B. Lazarus is a member of the board of directors of our general partner.  Ms. Lazarus is Chairman Emeritus and former Chief Executive Officer of Ogilvy & Mather Worldwide, a global marketing communications company.
She joined Ogilvy & Mather Worldwide in 1971, becoming president of its U.S. direct marketing business in 1989. She then became president of Ogilvy & Mather New York and president of Ogilvy & Mather North America before becoming President and Chief Operating Officer of the worldwide agency in 1995; Chief Executive Officer in 1996, which position she held to 2008; and Chairman from 1997 until her retirement in June 2012.
Ms. Lazarus also serves on the boards of Merck & Co., Inc., General Electric (where she chairs the Nominating, Corporate Governance and Public Responsibility Committee), the World Wildlife Fund, Partnership for New York City and Lincoln Center for the Performing Arts; is a trustee of the New York Presbyterian Hospital; and is a member of the Board of Overseers of Columbia Business School. She is also a member of the Council on Foreign Relations, The Business Council, and Women's Forum, Inc.
A graduate of Smith College, Ms. Lazarus also holds an MBA from Columbia University.







Jay O. Light*
Dean Emeritus, Harvard Business School





 Jay O. Light  is a member of the board of directors of our general partner.
 
As Dean of Harvard Business School, Mr. Light is currently leading innovations in the School’s core educational programs and plays an active role in the University’s planning for Allston. Prior to becoming Dean, Professor Light was Senior Associate Dean, Chairman of the Finance Area, and a Professor teaching Investment Management, Capital Markets, and Entrepreneurial Finance for 30 years.
 
Mr. Light is a director of the Harvard Management Company, a director of Partners HealthCare (the Mass General and Brigham & Women’s Hospitals) and chairman of its Investment Committee, a member of the Investment Committee of several endowments, a director of several private firms, and an advisor/trustee to several corporate and institutional pools of capital.








The Right Honorable Brian Mulroney*
Former Prime Minister of Canada





 The Right Honerable Brian Mulroney is a member of the board of directors of our general partner. Mr. Mulroney is a senior partner and international business consultant for the Montreal law firm, Ogilvy Renault LLP/ S.E.N.C.R.C., s.r.l.
 
Prior to joining Ogilvy Renault, Mr. Mulroney was the eighteenth Prime Minister of Canada from 1984 to 1993 and leader of the Progressive Conservative Party of Canada from 1983 and 1993. He served as the Executive Vice President of the Iron Ore Company of Canada and President beginning in 1977. Prior to that, Mr. Mulroney served on the Clich'e Commission of Inquiry in 1974.
 
Mr. Mulroney is a member of the Board of Directors of Archer Daniels Midland Company, Barrick Gold Corporation, Quebecor Inc., Quebecor World Inc., the World Trade Center Memorial Foundation and Wyndham Worldwide Corporation.








William G. Parrett*
Retired CEO and Senior Partner, Deloitte (Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu)





William G. Parrett is a member of the board of directors of our general partner.
Mr. Parrett was elected to the board of directors of our general partner effective November 9, 2007. Until May 31, 2007, Mr. Parrett served as the Chief Executive Officer of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu. Certain of the member firms of Deloitte Touche Tohmatsu or their subsidiaries and affiliates provide professional services to The Blackstone Group L.P. or its affiliates. Mr. Parrett co-founded the Global Financial Services Industry practice of Deloitte and served as its first Chairman.
Currently, Mr. Parrett is Senior Trustee of the United States Council for International Business. Mr. Parrett is a member of the board of directors of Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc., Eastman Kodak Company and UBS AG, and is Chairman of the audit committee of each of these companies as well as the Corporate Responsibility Committee of UBS and the Strategy and Finance Committee of Thermo Fisher. He is also a member of the Board of Directors of Conduent. Mr. Parrett is a member of the Board of Trustees of Carnegie Hall and a past Chairman of the Board of Trustees of United Way Worldwide. Mr. Parrett is a Certified Public Accountant with an active license.
















Senior Advisors & Consultants
The advisors and consultants listed below are independent professionals that work with Blackstone and our portfolio companies to provide unique global perspectives, strong regional knowledge and access to a wealth of relationships that enhance our ability to serve our clients and capture opportunities around the world. While not employees, personnel, partners or otherwise affiliates of Blackstone, these professionals have a strong and strategic professional connection with Blackstone.
Our network is comprised of highly respected individuals who possess a wealth of experience in both the private and public sectors. These advisors work with Blackstone professionals on generating new business, advising on transactions and giving business-related expertise.

 





James Albaugh
Senior Advisor










Mimi Alemayehou
Executive Advisor &  Chair of Blackstone Africa Infrastructure L.P.





Mimi Alemayehou is an Executive Advisor and Chair of Blackstone Africa Infrastructure L.P. 

Prior to joining Blackstone, Ms. Alemayehou was the Executive Vice President of The Overseas Private Investment Corporation (OPIC), the development finance agency of the U.S. government, in the Obama Administration.

During Ms. Alemayehou’s tenure from 2010 to 2014, OPIC’s portfolio grew by more than 24 percent to $18 billion. Her leadership was instrumental in tripling the corporation’s Africa portfolio to nearly $4 billion. Ms. Alemayehou was one of the architects of President Obama’s Power Africa initiative to increase energy access across the continent.  

Previously, Ms. Alemayehou was appointed by President George W. Bush to serve as the United States Executive Director on the board of the African Development Bank (AfDB).  As the senior Treasury official in Africa, Ms. Alemayehou represented the U.S. on Treasury and development issues and was instrumental in pushing the AfDB to increase its lending to the private sector in support of infrastructure projects.   
Prior to AfDB, Ms. Alemayehou was Founder and Managing Partner of Trade Links, LLC, a development consulting firm.  Ms. Alemayehou also managed a multi-country trade project in Africa for the International Executive Service Corps, and was Director of International Regulatory Affairs for WorldSpace Corporation, a satellite telecommunications company. She started her career in the U.S. Congress, working for U.S. Representative Mac Thornberry. 

Ms. Alemayehou holds a Masters degree in International Business and International Law and Development from the Fletcher School of Law and Diplomacy, Tufts University.








Bob Barthelmes
Senior Advisor





Bob Barthelmes is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone with a focus on leveraging software services and technology across the Blackstone portfolio companies, specifically for Blackstone’s investments in India-based technology companies.
Mr. Barthelmes is the former EVP and GM of the Open Source Division at Misys Corporation, and the Global Vice President of Business Consulting Services at IBM.  His team at Misys was featured in Harvard Business Review’s, “Great Leaders in Innovation.”
Mr. Barthelmes received a degree from the University of Lowell with a major in Business Administration and a minor in mathematics/computer science.  He attended the IBM Executive Programs at Harvard Business School and the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania.  He is currently on the Executive Committee for the Frank Lloyd Write Foundation.  







Wayne Berman
Senior Advisor





Wayne Berman is Senior Advisor for Global Government Affairs to the Blackstone Group.
A highly regarded advisor on the management of political and legislative risk, government relations strategy, and both domestic and foreign policy, Mr. Berman has advised dozens of companies over his 35 years in Washington.  He is a former chairman of Ogilvy Government Relations, one of the leading firms of its kind in the United States.   
Mr. Berman’s public service includes a presidential appointment as Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Policy and a variety of positions in eight Presidential political campaigns.  He served as Senior Advisor for the Bush-Cheney Transition (2001), Vice Presidential Campaign Director for Dole-Kemp (1996), member of the Budget and Policy Priorities Committee of the Pataki Transition Team (1994), Deputy Director and Executive Producer of the 1992 Republican National Convention, Senior Staff and Director of Congressional Relations during the Bush Campaign (1988), and Deputy Director of the Reagan-Bush Transition Team (1981).
Mr. Berman received a B.A. in History from the University of Buffalo.







Claudio Boada
Senior Advisor and Chairman of Blackstone Iberia





Claudio Boada is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone, focused on advising Blackstone on investment opportunities in Spain and Portugal.  He is also involved with facilitating introductions and performing due diligence on prospective partners, as well as helping Blackstone understand key dynamics in Spain and Portugal.
Mr. Boada is currently Honorary Chairman of Círculo de Empresarios (similar to the U.S. Business Roundtable), Chairman of Atlas Capital Private Equity, Chairman of the Advisory Board of Abantia Ticsa, Member of the Board of Directors of Abantia Empresarial and Aegon España, S.A., Member of the European Advisory Board of HSBC and Senior Advisor of HSBC for Spain & Portugal and Member of the Board of Asociación para el Progreso de la Dirección “APD” (similar to the American Management Association).
Mr. Boada is the former Chairman of Holcim España, S.A., Chairman of the Advisory Board of AON Gil y Carvajal, Member of the Board of Directors of Areas, S.A., Non-Executive Chairman of Lehman Brothers Spain & Portugal, General Manager of Banco de Progreso, and was involved with international financing and mergers and acquisitions for Dillon, Read Overseas Corporation for Spain & Portugal.
Mr. Boada received a B.S. in Industrial Engineering from the Madrid Polytechnic University, and an M.B.A. from the University of Southern California.  He was distinguished in 2005 by the Madrid Official Association of Industrial Engineers as “Engineer of the Year.”







Derek Cheng
Senior Advisor





Derek Cheng is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone’s Private Equity group focusing on investments in Greater China.  He is the former Assistant CEO of China Resources Capital Holdings Co., and before that held numerous positions within the company.
Mr. Cheng received an MBA degree from University of Louisville and a Bachelor’s degree in Economics from the University of International Business and Economics, China.  








Mary Anne Citrino
Senior Advisor





Mary Anne Citrino is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone.
Ms. Citrino is a former Senior Managing Director in the Blackstone Advisory Partners group and advised a broad range of clients in the consumer products industry including Procter & Gamble, Kraft Foods and Nestlé. Notable transactions include advising P&G on numerous assignments, including the split-off of Folger's Coffee in a Reverse Morris Trust transaction to Smuckers, the purchase of Ambi-Pur from Sara Lee, the sale of its European tissue/towel business (Bounty, Charmin and Tempo) to SCA, its minority investment in MDVIP and the acquisition of Doctor's Dermatologic Formula. She advised Kraft on its Reverse Morris Trust transaction with Ralcorp of Kraft's Post cereal business, Stiefel on the sale of the company to GSK, Albertson's on the sale of the company, Nestlé on the purchase of Kraft’s frozen pizza business, Coty on its acquisition of philosophy, North Castle on the sale of Avalon Natural Products to Hain Celestial, and the board of Atkins Nutritionals on the sale of the company.
Before joining Blackstone in 2004, Ms. Citrino was Global Head of Consumer Products Investment Banking Group at Morgan Stanley. Prior to running the Consumer Products group, Ms. Citrino was Co-Head of Health Care Services Investment Banking at Morgan Stanley. Ms. Citrino spent more than 20 years advising clients at Morgan Stanley. Notable transactions at Morgan Stanley include advising Unilever on its acquisitions of Ben & Jerry's, Slim-Fast and Helene Curtis as well as selling its Diversey Lever business to SC Johnson. She also advised Pfizer on its sale of Schick to Energizer, Hershey Trust on its attempted sale of Hershey to Wrigley, and structured and advised on Heinz's Reverse Morris Trust spin-off assets to Del Monte. In December 2009, the Blackstone consumer advisory team was recognized by the M&A Advisor with the awards for Deal of the Year in the Americas” (P&G’s divestiture of its Folgers coffee business to J.M. Smucker) and “Dealmaker of the Year” (Mary Anne Citrino).
Ms. Citrino received a BA in Economics from Princeton University, Phi Beta Kappa, and received her MBA from Harvard Business School as a George F. Baker scholar. She is a Director of Dollar Tree Stores, Inc., Health Net, Inc., and Hewlett Packard, Inc., and serves on the Advisory Council for the Center for Health and Wellbeing at Princeton University.







General Wesley K. Clark
Senior Advisor





General Wesley K. Clark is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone with a focus on the firm’s private equity activities in the energy sector.
General Clark serves as Chairman and CEO of Wesley K. Clark & Associates, a strategic consulting firm; Co-Chairman of Growth Energy; senior fellow at UCLA's Burkle Center for International Relations; Director of International Crisis Group; Chairman of City Year Little Rock; as well as numerous corporate boards. General Clark has authored three books and serves as a member of the Clinton Global Initiative's Energy & Climate Change Advisory Board, and ACORE's Advisory Board.
General Clark retired a four star general after 38 years in the United States Army. He graduated first in his class at West Point and completed degrees in Philosophy, Politics and Economics at Oxford University (B.A. and M.A.) as a Rhodes Scholar.
His awards include the Presidential Medal of Freedom, Defense Distinguished Service Medal (five awards), Silver star, bronze star, purple heart, honorary knighthoods from the British and Dutch governments, and numerous other awards from other governments, including award of Commander of the Legion of Honor (France). 







Theodore Craver Jr.
Senior Advisor





Theodore (Ted) Craver, Jr., is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone’s Infrastructure group.  
Previously, Mr. Craver was Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer of Edison International, one of the nation’s largest electric utilities companies, since 2008.  Before joining Edison in 1996, Mr. Craver served as Executive Vice President and Corporate Treasurer of First Interstate Bancorp, where he led the integration of this multi-bank company’s funding, risk management, investment, and insurance activities.  Throughout much of his 23 years in banking, he served in various capital markets sales and trading positions at Security Pacific National Bank, Bankers Trust Company of New York, and First Interstate Bancorp. 
Mr. Craver is currently a non-executive director at Duke Energy.  He is also a member of the Economic Advisory Council of the Federal Reserve Bank’s 12th District, and serves on the Board of the Smithsonian National Museum of American History and is the Vice Chair of the Autry Museum of the American West.  Previously, he served on the Board of Directors of Health Net and Edison International. 
Mr. Craver earned an MBA and a bachelor’s degree in economics and international relations from the University of Southern California.







John Dionne
Senior Advisor





John D. Dionne is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone and a Lecturer in the Finance Unit at the Harvard Business School.
Until he retired from his position as a Senior Managing Director of Blackstone in 2013, Mr. Dionne was most recently its Global Head of the Private Equity Business Development and Investor Relations Groups, and also served as a member of its Private Equity Investment and Valuation Committees. During his tenure in this position, Mr. Dionne led global fundraising efforts of over $25 billion for three new private equity investment vehicles in the period immediately following the financial crisis.
Mr. Dionne originally joined Blackstone in 2004 as the Founder and Chief Investment Officer of the Blackstone Distressed Securities Fund, the firm's initial entry into the single-manager hedge fund business, with peak assets under management of over $2 billion. During this period, he also served on the Investment Committees of Blackstone’s GSO and Kalix investment businesses.
Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Dionne was for several years a Partner and Portfolio Manager for Bennett Restructuring Funds, a multi-billion dollar hedge fund specializing in financially troubled companies, during which time he also served on several official and ad-hoc creditor committees.
Previously, Mr. Dionne was a Partner at Saugatuck Capital where he invested in middle-market buyouts and restructured troubled portfolio companies. From 1991 through 1996, he was Director of Corporate Development for a predecessor of Thermo Fisher Scientific Inc. Mr. Dionne began his career at Price Waterhouse as a public accountant.
Mr. Dionne has served on the board of directors of many companies and not-for-profit institutions. He is a Chartered Financial Analyst and Certified Public Accountant (inactive).
Mr. Dionne received academic honors while earning an MBA from the Harvard Business School and a Bachelor of Science degree from the University of Scranton, where he is a past Chair of its' Board of Trustees.








Gerard Errera
Senior Advisor &  Chairman of Blackstone France





Ambassador Gérard Errera is Chairman of the Blackstone Group in France.
Prior to this, Mr. Errera, a career diplomat, was Secretary General of the French Ministry of Foreign Affairs (2007-2009), Ambassador to the United Kingdom (2002-2007), to NATO (1995-1998) and Director General for Political Affairs of the French Ministry of Foreign Affairs (1998-2002). He also served as Director for International Affairs at the French Atomic Energy Commission (CEA) and Governor for France at the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA). He was on the Board of AREVA and EDF. Mr. Errera is a regular contributor to the Financial Times. He is a graduate of the Ecole Nationale d’Administration (ENA). He is Officier of the Légion d’Honneur and Commander of the Victorian Order (C.V.O.).







Bob Friedman
Senior Advisor





Robert L. Friedman is a Senior Advisor of The Blackstone Group L.P.
Mr. Friedman joined Blackstone in 1999 as a Senior Managing Director, working primarily in Blackstone’s Private Equity Group and also participating in the work of its Financial Advisory Group.  He served as Chief Legal Officer of the firm from 2003 through 2010, continuing for most of that period to also participate in some of the work of the firm’s Private Equity Group and its Financial Advisory Group.  He also served as the firm’s Chief Administrative Officer from 2003 through 2007. In 2012 he retired as a Senior Managing Director and became a Senior Advisor of the firm.
Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Friedman had been a partner of Simpson Thacher & Bartlett for 25 years, where he was a senior member of that New York City law firm’s mergers and acquisitions practice. 
Mr. Friedman has served on 12 different boards of directors of public and private companies over the past 15 years.  He currently serves as a director of Axis Capital Holdings Limited and YRC Worldwide Inc. and is Chairman of the Board of Harrington Reinsurance Holding Ltd.  He is also a member of the boards of directors of each of United Way of New York City, Nantucket Land Council and New Alternatives for Children, serving as Chairman of the Board of the latter organization, which conducts a variety of programs for disadvantaged youth in New York City who suffer from physical and mental disabilities.
Mr. Friedman graduated from Columbia College in 1964 and received a JD from the University of Pennsylvania Law School in 1967.







Dan Gillerman
Senior Advisor





Ambassador Dan Gillerman is Senior Advisor to Blackstone Israel and is a member of Blackstone's International Advisory Board. 
Ambassador Gillerman is chairman of Gillerman Global Ltd, a global strategic consulting firm. He served as Israel's Ambassador to the United Nations from 2003-2008 and was elected Vice President of the General Assembly in 2005.
Prior to his appointment to the UN, Ambassador Gillerman was Chairman of the Israel Chamber of Commerce from 1985 till 2002. He served on the Boards of several Israeli companies and major banks,including Bank Leumi,The First International Bank,and Israel's Central Bank.
Ambassador Gillerman is Chairman of the Board of the Israel Opera, Co-Chairman of the AIFL (the America-Israel Friendship League), a member of the Executive Board of the Weizman Institute of Science, and a member of the Boards of Governors of The Hebrew University, Tel Aviv University and the Jewish Agency. He is a trustee of The Tel Aviv Museum of Art and the Cameri theater.
Ambassador Gillerman studied Political Science and Economics at the Hebrew University in Jerusalem and Law at Tel Aviv University. He received Honorary Doctorates (Honorus Causa) from Bar Ilan University and the Academic College, Netanya.







Constantine Gonticas
Senior Advisor











Bill Gray
Senior Advisor










Jill Greenthal 
Senior Advisor





Jill A. Greenthal is a Senior Advisor in the Private Equity Group. Prior to September 2007, Ms. Greenthal was a Senior Managing Director in the Advisory Group. She is based in Boston.  Before joining Blackstone in 2003, Ms. Greenthal was Co-Head of the Global Media Group, Co-Head of the Boston Office and a member of the Executive Board of Investment Banking at Credit Suisse First Boston. Ms. Greenthal was also Co-Head of the Boston office of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette, before its acquisition by CSFB. Prior to joining DLJ, she was Head of the Media Group at Lehman Brothers.   Ms. Greenthal has advised and financed media companies for over 30 years, having worked in all sectors of the business. As a Senior Advisor to Blackstone’s Private Equity group, Ms. Greenthal works closely with the global media and technology teams to assist in investments in those sectors.   Ms. Greenthal graduated as a member of The Academy from Simmons College and received an MBA from Harvard Business School. Ms. Greenthal is on the Board of Directors of Akamai Technologies, Michaels Stores, Inc., The Weather Channel Companies and Houghton Mifflin Harcourt.  Ms. Greenthal is also a Trustee of the Dana-Farber Cancer Institute, The James Beard Foundation, Simmons College and is an Overseer of the Museum of Fine Arts in Boston.







Arthur Higgins
Senior Advisor










David Jacobs 
Executive Advisor





David Jacobs is an Executive Advisor to Blackstone’s Tactical Opportunities Group.  He is primarily involved with originating, sourcing and evaluating investments in private opportunities with a particular focus on acquisitions and investments in portfolios. 
Mr. Jacobs was previously an Investment Partner and member of the Board of Directors of Nova Capital Management, a specialist acquirer of portfolios sourced from both corporate and private equity sellers, and has headed global groups for both Morgan Stanley and Deutsche Bank.  Mr. Jacobs has over 30 years of investment banking experience providing financial advisory services to companies around the world.  He has been involved in innovative and complex mergers and acquisitions, and financing transactions for clients in the consumer, retail and business services sectors.  
Mr. Jacobs graduated cum laude from the Wharton School of the University of Pennsylvania, and received an MBA from the Wharton Business School.








David Johnson
Senior Advisor





David Johnson advises all Blackstone business units  on their technology investments. 
Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Johnson was Senior Vice President of Strategy at Dell Corporation, where he was responsible for software, corporate strategy, corporate development, and acquisition integration.  Prior to joining Dell, Mr. Johnson held a number of positions at International Business Machines, including Vice President of Corporate Development, responsible for the company’s acquisitions, divestitures, minority investments, and acquisition integration.  Dave serves as a Blackstone member of the Optiv and Pactera Board of Directors.


Mr. Johnson received a B.A. in English and an M.B.A. from Boston College.







Kemal Kaya
Senior Advisor





Kemal Kaya is a Senior Advisor based in Turkey. Mr. Kaya focuses on developing business initiatives and advising Blackstone on potential transactions as well as helping to identify potential advisory opportunities in the region. Mr Kaya also serves as Chairman of the Board of Multi Turkey.
Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Kaya was the CEO of Yapi Kredi Bank, one of the leading financial groups in Turkey. He assumed this position after leading Turkey’s first privately owned bank merger, the combination of Yapi Kredi Bank and Kocbank. Before the merger of the two banks, Mr. Kaya served as General Manager of Kocbank and CEO of Koc Financial Services, a financial holding company owned by Koc Holding, and UniCredit. Mr. Kaya played a leading role in the formation of the Koc Holding -UniCredit partnership in 2002. Earlier in his career, he also held various senior positions in financial institutions and investor relations management at Yapi Kredi Bank.
Mr. Kaya was educated in the United States and received his BS in Business Administration from the University of Kansas. 







Yuji Kage 
Senior Advisor





Yuji Kage is a Senior Advisor in the Investor Relations & Business Development group and is based in Tokyo.
Before joining Blackstone in 2009, Mr. Kage was the MD-CIO of Pension Fund Association of Japan for four years. Prior to that, he led LTCB Investment Management, UBS Asset Management Japan, and Shinkin Asset Management as CEO. Mr. Kage has 23 years of experience in Corporate Finance, including a ten-year assignment in London, as Executive Vice-President, and in New York, as Chief Executive Officer, of an LTCB subsidiary.
Mr. Kage served as a member of the advisory committees of FSA, MHLW, Government Pension Investment Fund, Tokyo Stock Exchange, and a few major institutions. Currently, he is a member of the board of Securities Analyst Association of Japan, and he serves as a member of the advisory boards of several government-related bodies and institutions.
Mr. Kage received a B.A. in Economics from Tokyo University. He also attended the Corporate Finance Program at Harvard Business School.







Andrew Kuo
Senior Advisor





Andrew Kuo is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone for Greater China. 
Before joining Blackstone Mr. Kuo was Managing Director and Head of Greater China for H&Q Asia Pacific. Prior to that he was Managing Director, Senior Country Officer, and Vice Chairman of the Greater China Operating Committee of JP Morgan in Hong Kong. Mr. Kuo was also with Citibank Taipei, as the Head of the Corporate Banking Group. He has served on the Advisory Committee of the Hong Kong Monetary Authority (HKMA) and as a member of the Advisory Board for InvestHK.
Mr. Kuo received a BA from Fu-Jen Catholic University and an MBA from the City University of New York.  Mr. Kuo is also an independent non-executive director of Cathay Financial Holdings in Taiwan and of Samson Holding in Hong Kong.








Andrew Lapham
Executive Advisor










John A. Magliano
Senior Advisor





John A. Magliano is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone. Prior to his retirement at the end of 2016, Mr. Magliano was most recently a Managing Director and head of Blackstone’s Tax Group.
Mr. Magliano joined Blackstone in 2002 and held a number of key leadership positions in the firm’s Finance group including responsibility for the firm’s global tax initiatives including strategic planning, tax compliance and reporting. He previously was the CFO of Blackstone’s Private Equity Group and oversaw the accounting, tax and financial reporting and administration of the Group. Prior to that, Mr. Magliano oversaw Blackstone's partnership finance and accounting team. Mr. Magliano was also involved in other strategic planning projects for the firm. 
Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Magliano was the owner of a consulting firm, where he worked with a large state pension fund, corporations, partnerships, and high net worth individuals. Prior to establishing his firm, Mr. Magliano was a partner with Arthur Andersen, where he spent approximately 20 years in the firm's tax division.
Mr. Magliano received a BS in Accounting from St. John's University, where he graduated cum laude. He is a Certified Public Accountant and a member of the AICPA and NYSSCPA.







Philippe Meyer
Senior Advisor





Philippe Meyer is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone’s Private Equity group, focused primarily on the industrials sector.  
Before becoming a Senior Advisor for Blackstone, Mr. Meyer was President of Tyco Flow Control, a manufacturing and distribution business with over 13,000 employees, operating in 130 locations worldwide.  During his tenure, Tyco Flow Control grew from $40 million to an over $3 billion global business, which is considered a world leader in its industry.  Prior to joining Tyco in 1991, Mr. Meyer held various management positions, the most recent being Directeur de Marché, at Pont-A-Mousson S.A., a division of the Saint-Gobain group in France.  

Mr. Meyer has served on the boards of several current and former Blackstone portfolio companies, including Gerresheimer and Klöckner Pentaplast.  He also serves as Executive Chairman of Cala Capital, a small-cap private equity firm based in Belgium.







James A. Quella
Senior Advisor





James Quella serves as an advisor focusing on strategy and operational performance of Blackstone’s private equity portfolio companies. Mr. Quella currently serves on the boards of Catalent, DJO, Freescale and Michaels Stores.
Previously, Mr. Quella was a Senior Managing Director and the Head of Portfolio Operations at Blackstone between 2004 and 2013, where he led the performance improvement initiatives across all businesses and functions at the portfolio companies. Prior to that, Mr. Quella was a Managing Director and Senior Operating Partner with Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Merchant Banking Partners-CSFB Private Equity.
Before that, Mr. Quella worked at Mercer Management Consulting and Strategic Planning Associates, its predecessor firm, where he served as a Senior Consultant to Chief Executive Officers and senior management teams and was Co-Vice Chairman. He is also the co-author of “Profit Patterns: 30 Ways to Anticipate and Profit from the Strategic Forces Reshaping Your Business”.
Mr. Quella received a BA in International Studies from the University of Chicago & University of Wisconsin-Madison and an MBA with dean’s honors from the University of Chicago.








Peter Rose
Senior Advisor





Peter Rose is a Senior Advisor for Public Affairs.
Prior to becoming a Senior Advisor, Mr. Rose was a Senior Managing Director, heading Blackstone’s Public Affairs Group. Mr. Rose was responsible for media relations and government relations, as well as communications to a broad range of public and other constituencies.
Before joining Blackstone in 2007, Mr. Rose was at Goldman Sachs for 20 years. He was a lobbyist and political analyst in their Washington office and in 1996 moved to New York to open Goldman Sachs first ever media relations office as it began the transition from a private to a public company. In 1998 he moved to Asia to set up a corporate communications function for Goldman Sachs there, returning in 2003 to head the media relations function for the firm in the Americas. Before joining Goldman Sachs, he was Chief of Staff for Congressman Mike Synar (D Okla) and a partner with a Washington DC law firm. Mr. Rose has a BA from the George Washington University and received a JD from Yale Law School. He is a member of the national board of the NAACP.








Steven Saslow 
Senior Advisor





Steven Saslow serves as a Senior Advisor to Blackstone’s Alternatives Asset Management Group (BAAM).  In this capacity, Mr. Saslow advises the company’s investment committee, mentors and trains analysts and associates, and maintains relationships with hedge funds. 
Prior to his appointment as Senior Advisor, Mr. Saslow served as  the Chief Investment Officer of the Blackstone Relative Value Fund from 2002-2005, a Managing Director in BAAM from 2006-2007, and most recently as a consultant to the firm from 2007 -2016.
Mr. Saslow began his career at the Bank of New York after receiving a BA from Rutgers College. He later became a Partner and Senior Executive for Carroll McEntee & McGinley, Senior Executive and Trading Desk Manager for Marine Midland Bank, and Executive Managing Director at HSBC.
Mr. Saslow also serves as a mentor for Rutgers University Road to Wall Street Program, designed to boost the preparation skills for a select group of students who demonstrate strong interest in and knowledge of financial markets.







Timothy Schifter
Senior Advisor





Timothy Schifter is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone, focusing on the apparel, accessories, and footwear industries globally.
Prior to his appointment as a Senior Advisor, Mr. Schifter was a consultant to the firm from May 2012 to May 2013 and has participated in the firm’s analysis of a number of investment opportunities in the fashion, apparel and luxury industries and was involved in the execution of the firm's investment in Simone. Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Schifter was Chief Executive Officer of Schifter + Partners LLC and prior to that he was Chief Executive Officer and co-owner of LeSportsac, Inc.
Mr. Schifter graduated with a BA degree from Pitzer College. Mr. Schifter serves as Executive Chairman of the Board of Directors of J.W. Hulme Co and as a member of the Board of Directors of Serena & Lily, R.G. Barry as well as Simone.







Yong Kyu Shin
Senior Advisor











James R. Socas
Executive Advisor





James R. Socas is an Executive Advisor to Tactical Opportunities at Blackstone.  Mr. Socas has invested in, advised and financed software and technology companies for over twenty years, having worked in all sectors of the industry as a senior executive, board member, growth capital investor, and strategic advisor. 
Before joining Blackstone in 2017, Mr. Socas was General Partner at Updata Partners, a technology growth equity firm, and co-managed the firm.  Earlier, Mr. Socas served on the global leadership team of Symantec (Nasdaq: SYMC), as head of corporate development, leading Symantec’s mergers & acquisitions, corporate venture investing, and strategic, financial and technology alliances. He conceived, negotiated and executed Symantec’s highly publicized international joint venture with Huawei Technologies, one of China’s leading technology companies, and drove the successful billion dollar acquisition of systems management leader Altiris, as well as several other major corporate acquisitions. Prior to Symantec, Mr. Socas was a Managing Director with Credit Suisse First Boston and Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette, executing over $20 billion in M&A transactions and $15 billion in capital raising for technology industry clients.  
Mr. Socas  has served on numerous public and non-profit boards and also served two terms on Virginia’s Board of Corrections.  He  is a graduate of the University of Virginia and the Harvard Business School. He lives in McLean, Virginia with his wife and three sons. 







Maggie Wilderotter
Senior Advisor





Maggie Wilderotter is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone, focused on providing due diligence on potential telecom and technology investment opportunities for Blackstone’s Private Equity group and GSO Capital Partners LP.
Prior to joining Blackstone, Mrs. Wilderotter was Chief Executive Officer of Frontier Communications from November 2004 to April 2015 and then Executive Chairman of the company until April 2016. During her tenure with Frontier, the company grew from a regional telephone company with customer revenues of less than $1 billion to a national broadband, voice and video provider with operations in 29 states and annualized revenues in excess of $10 billion.
Previously, Mrs. Wilderotter was Senior Vice President of Global Business Strategy and ran the Worldwide Public Sector at Microsoft. Before this, she was President and CEO of Wink Communications Inc., Executive Vice President of National Operations for AT&T Wireless Services Inc., Chief Executive Officer of AT&T's Aviation Communications Division, and a Senior Vice President of McCaw Cellular Communications Inc.
Mrs. Wilderotter serves on the boards of Costco Wholesale Corporation, Dream Works Animation, Hewlett Packard Enterprise, and Juno Therapeutics, Inc. as well as a number of private and non-profit organizations. Mrs. Wilderotter served on the President's National Security Telecommunications Advisory Committee (NSTAC). From October 2010 to October 2012 she was Vice Chairman of NSTAC, and from October 2012 to November 2014 she served as Chairman of NSTAC.  Currently Mrs. Wilderotter is a Commissioner on the Presidents Cyber Security Policy Commission.
Mrs. Wilderotter is a member of the Board of Directors of The Conference Board; a member of the Executive Committee of the Catalyst Board of Directors; a member of the Board of Women in America; and a member of the Business Council and the Committee of 200. In 2014, she chaired the Blue Ribbon Committee on Board Strategy for NACD and is a member of WomenCorporateDirectors (WCD).
Mrs. Wilderotter holds a bachelor's degree in economics from the College of the Holy Cross. In 2014, she was awarded an Honorary Doctor of Engineering degree, honoris causa, from the Stevens Institute of Technology.







John Van der Wielen
Senior Advisor





John Van der Wielen has over 25 years of experience in Wealth Management, Private Banking and Insurance, which includes senior executive positions in Global Financial Services Groups.  He has led acquisitions and integration programs in several entities and has been an executive board member of ASX and FTSE companies.


Mr. Van Der Wielen’s most recent roles were with Friends Life and Resolution Plc U.K, ANZ Banking Group Australia and Lloyds Banking Group Plc U.K.  He currently serves on the boards of Lombard International Assurance-Luxembourg, Aviva plc subsidiary Friends, Provident International-Isle of Man, Arena Living-New Zealand, Partners Life-New Zealand, and KYCKR - ASX listing Australia.


Mr. Van Der Wielen studied at the University of Western Australia, London Business School and SAID Business College at Oxford.








Melford Yuan
Senior Advisor





Melford Yuan is a Senior Advisor to Blackstone’s Private Equity group focusing on investments in Greater China.  Before joining Blackstone, Mr. Yuan was a Managing Director at Morgan Stanley since 2007. He later became the Chief Representative of Morgan Stanley’s Beijing Office. 
Mr. Yuan received a BS in Economics from the State University of New York. He also studied Accounting at the Bernard Baruch College and Business Law at the Capital University of Economics and Trade.








Mike S. Zafirovski
Executive Advisor





Mike Zafirovski is an Executive Advisor to Blackstone, and serves on the board of directors of three  of Blackstone’s portfolio companies: non-executive chairman of DJO Global and PGI and independent director of Apria Healthcare Services. Since 2004, he has also served on the board of directors of Boeing, and since  2012, on the board of Stericycle.
Mr. Zafirovski is a founder and president of The Zaf Group, a management consulting and investment firm. Previously, Mr. Zafirovski served as President and CEO of Nortel, a global communications technology company; President and COO of Motorola; and during a 25-year career at GE, served as President and CEO of five GE businesses in the consumer, industrial and financial services arenas.
Among his education, civic and philanthropic activities, he is Vice Chairman of AUSL, the organization that helps turn around the most challenged public schools in Chicago. He is a visiting lecturer at the Northwestern Kellogg School of Management and Duke University’s Fuqua School of Business. A Macedonia native, he is a founding director and chairman of Macedonia 2025, an organization aiming to improve the country’s economic and democracy developments. He is a member of The Economic Club of Chicago and The Chicago Council of Global Affairs.
From 2006 to 2010, Mr. Zafirovski was a presidential appointee to the National Security Telecommunications Advisory Committee (NSTAC). NSTAC provides analytics and recommendations to the President on a wide range of policy and technical issues related to telecommunications, information systems, information assurance, infrastructure protection, and other national security and emergency preparedness concerns.
Mr. Zafirovski holds a B.A. in mathematics from Edinboro University in Pennsylvania. 






our history









				1985
			
Blackstone is founded by Stephen A. Schwarzman and Peter G. Peterson. 

					They began with a balance sheet of $400,000 and a clear vision of an independent, conflict-free, client-focused firm whose interests would be closely aligned with those of its clients and investors.
				






				1990
			
BAAM, the firm’s Hedge Fund Solutions business, is founded.






				1992
			
The firm’s Real Estate group is formed.






				1993
			
Blackstone becomes the largest independent alternative asset manager.






				1999
			
The firm’s corporate debt group is formed.






				2007
			
The firm completes its IPO listing on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol BX.






				2008
			
GSO Capital Partners is Acquired

					GSO Capital Partners is acquired, firmly positioning itself as one of the largest credit-oriented alternative asset managers.
				






				2008
			
The Blackstone Charitable Foundation is established.






				2010
			
Blackstone establishes strategic partnership with Patria Investments in Brazil.






				2012
			
The firm’s Tactical Opportunities business launches.






				2013
			
Blackstone acquires Strategic Partners, our secondary private fund of funds business.






				2015
			
The firm spins off its Advisory, Restructuring, and Park Hill fund placement businesses, which are combined with PJT Capital LP to form PJT Partners.






















   Back to Top
 








Quick Links



Explore Blackstone



Get in Touch




























© 2016 The Blackstone Group L.P. | English | 中文 (Chinese)

Transparency & Disclosure | Legal | Privacy | Cookie Notice | Japan Disclaimer


プライバシー・ポリシー   | 法規制に基づく開示
ブラックストーン・グループ・ジャパン株式会社
金融商品取引業者 関東財務局（金商）第１７８５号
加入協会/ 一般社団法人第二種金融商品取引業協会







Cookie Information and Consent Request
Blackstone Cookie Policy

This website uses cookies, including third-party cookies, which allow Blackstone to obtain information about your visit to the website. Please click on the link "Learn More" below if you would like more information about the cookies used on this website and how to select certain cookies. You will also be able to refuse the installation of certain cookies. By continuing to use this website (clicking on a picture or link under this banner), you consent to the use of cookies.

 Learn More 
Continue 








×

Stay up-to-date
Email Alerts



To receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien's Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.

 


email address (required)






first name (required)





last name (required)






company name



job title








Byron Wien Market Commentary





Blackstone Press Releases












  Submit








 ×
Contact Us
General

For office-specific contact information, please visit our offices page. 
 Switchboard: +1 (212) 583-5000

Email Alerts & Investor Relations

To receive email notifications when press releases or Byron Wien’s Market Commentaries are posted, sign up for email alerts here.


For investor relations contact information or to receive email notifications for SEC filings, events, end of day stock quotes, and financial reports, please visit our Investor Relations page.

Investor Relations Contact Information
  US: +1 888-756-8443
 International: +1 646-313-6590
 BlackstoneInvestorRelations@blackstone.com 

Media Contacts

For media inquiries or recent press releases, please click here.











 


Blackstone Group L.P. (BX) 10-K and 10-Q SEC Filings :: Last10K.com





















		 
	




Blackstone Group L.P. (BX) SEC Filing 10-K Annual report for the fiscal year ending Saturday, December 31, 2016














last10k.com/sec-filings/bx/0001193125-17-056300.htm



Earnings Release
10-K Annual Report
10-K Exhibits
10-K Statistics




Exhibit 99.1   


 Blackstone Reports Fourth Quarter and Full Year 2016 Results 
New York, January 26, 2017: Blackstone (NYSE:BX) today reported its fourth quarter and full year 2016 results. 
Stephen A. Schwarzman, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, said, Blackstones most recent results marked a strong finish to a turbulent year, as
fourth quarter earnings nearly doubled versus the prior year period. Full year earnings rose significantly due to greater appreciation across the investment funds as well as strong growth in fee related income. Our robust investment returns
attracted best-in-class capital inflows, driving Total Assets Under Management to $367 billion, another record. And we continue to pay substantial distributions to
our unitholders, delivering over $8 billion of value in the past three years, which is the highest of any public firm in our industry. 
Blackstone issued a full detailed presentation of its fourth quarter and full year 2016 results, which can be viewed at www.blackstone.com. 
Distribution  Blackstone has declared a quarterly
distribution of $0.47 per common unit to record holders of common units at the close of business on February 6, 2017. This distribution will be paid on February 13, 2017. 
Quarterly Investor Call Details  Blackstone will host a
conference call on January 26, 2017 at 11:00 a.m. ET to discuss fourth quarter and full year 2016 results. The conference call can be accessed via the Investors section of Blackstones website at www.blackstone.com or by
dialing +1 (877) 391-6747 (U.S. domestic) or +1 (617) 597-9291 (international), pass code 149 943 55#. For those unable to listen to the
live broadcast, a replay will be available on www.blackstone.com or by dialing +1 (888) 286-8010 (U.S. domestic) or +1 (617) 801-6888
(international), pass code 453 218 99#.  About Blackstone 
Blackstone is one of the worlds leading investment firms. We seek to create positive economic impact and long-term value for our investors, the companies
we invest in, and the communities in which we work. We do this by using extraordinary people and flexible capital to help companies solve problems. Our asset management businesses, with over $360 billion in assets under management, include
investment vehicles focused on private equity, real estate, public debt and equity, non-investment grade credit, real assets and secondary funds, all on a global basis. Further information is available at
www.blackstone.com. Follow Blackstone on Twitter @Blackstone. 
   
The Blackstone Group L.P.  345 Park Avenue 
New York, New York 10154  T 212 583 5000 



                                The following information was filed by Blackstone Group L.P. on Thursday, January 26, 2017 as an 8K 2.02 statement, which is a press release pertaining to results of operations and financial condition. It may be helpful to assess the quality of management by comparing the information in the press release to the information in the accompanying 10-K Annual Report statement of earnings and operation as management may choose to highlight particular information in the press release.
                            




        Sentiment Analysis
        off 
        


 on





                    Filter by Sentiment:
                    
Positive (77)
Negative (99)
All



                    Filter by Category:
                    
Financial (87)
Revenue & Net Sales (36)
All



Watch our Sentiment Analysis Video 




                    Filter by Subcategory:
                    
Cash Flow (2)
Debt (2)
Earnings (12)
Expense (36)
Geography (3)
Income (17)
Product (33)
Shares / Equity (14)
Other (53)
All




Click a sentiment analysis snippet below from BX's Management Discussions to find these positive and negative remarks within their 10-K Annual report:



bx_10k_2017-02-24_387_976Financial - ExpenseDollars in Thousands 2016 2015 2014 Operating Expensesa $629,342 $624,357 $553,782 Less: Interest Expense 197,506 175,782 132,855 Non-Interest Operating Expenses $431,836 $448,575 $420,927 Realized Incentive Feesa 172,101 194,746 261,745 Less: Realized Incentive Fee Compensationa 78,096 85,946 110,099 Net Realized Incentive Fees $94,005 $108,800 $151,646 Realized Carried Interesta 1,474,915 3,205,876 2,450,596 Less: Realized Carried Interest Compensationa 455,954 793,800 815,643 Net Realized Carried Interest $1,018,961 $2,412,076 $1,634,953 Interest Income and Dividend Revenuea 145,883 131,601 96,344 Less: Interest Expense 197,506 175,782 132,855 Net Interest Loss $51,623 $44,181 $36,511 Equity-Based Compensationb $79,571 $103,044 $48,226 Taxes and Related Payablesc $167,149 $90,470 $280,788 Unrealized Incentive Feesa 49,729 7,249 29,425 Less: Unrealized Incentive Fee Compensationa 21,134 2,490 19,276 Net Unrealized Incentive Fees $28,595 $4,759 $10,149 Unrealized Carried Interesta 481,241 1,595,296 1,708,961 Less: Unrealized Carried Interest Compensationa 312,838 312,696 379,037 Net Unrealized Carried Interest $168,403 $1,282,600 $1,329,924 Related Payablesd $74,886 $62,943 $81,276
bx_10k_2017-02-24_317_415Revenue - ProductRevenues in our Hedge Fund Solutions segment in 2016 were moderately lower than in 2015 primarily driven by lower Performance Fees as a result of the significant volatility in global markets and the decline in equity and fixed income asset prices in the first quarter of 2016.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_317_418Revenue - ProductHedge Fund Solutions revenues would likely be negatively impacted if global asset prices experienced another period of extreme volatility or decline, including as a result of uncertainty regarding governmental and tax policy, or liquidity needs caused investors to withdraw assets.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_281_343Financial - Shares / EquityPerformance Fees, which are determined on a fund by fund basis, were $757.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $1.2 billion, compared to $2.0 billion for the year ended December 31, 2014, principally due to the performance in our corporate private equity funds, which generated overall solid net performance which was, however, lower than the net returns in 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_401_542Financial - Shares / EquityGenerally our funds in our private equity segment, our opportunistic, real estate funds, funds of hedge funds and certain credit-focused funds have not utilized substantial leverage at the fund level other than for a short-term borrowings between the date of an investment and the receipt of capital from the investing funds investors, and b long-term borrowings for certain investments in aggregate amounts which are generally 1% to 25% of the capital commitments of the respective fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_104_272Financial - ExpenseThe increase in Fund Expenses primarily occurred in our Credit segment, where it was attributable to newly launched CLOs and an increase in other expenses.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_56_134Financial - ExpenseBlackstone recognizes accrued interest and penalties related to uncertain tax positions in General, Administrative, and Other expenses within the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_104_264Financial - ExpenseThe decrease was primarily attributable to decreases in Performance Fee Compensation and Compensation of $720.9 million and $142.7 million, respectively, partially offset by increases of $49.0 million and $23.0 million in Fund Expenses and Interest Expense, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_99_245Financial - ExpenseThe decrease was primarily attributable to decreases in Compensation, General, Administrative and Other, and Fund Expenses of $390.8 million, $55.8 million and $27.3 million, respectively, partially offset by an increase in Performance Fee Compensation of $303.5 million.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_502_1028Legal - OtherFor financial reporting purposes, when applicable, the general partners record a liability for potential clawback obligations to the limited partners of some of the carry funds due to changes in the unrealized value of a funds remaining investments and where the funds general partner has previously received Carried Interest distributions with respect to such funds realized investments.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_102_258Other - OtherPerformance Fees decreased in our Credit segment due to our energy investments, overall declines in the credit market, underperformance in certain event-driven assets and technical pressure caused by year end selling.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_306_407Financial - ExpenseThe increase in Other Operating Expenses was primarily due to an increase in interest expense allocated to the segment and certain one-time costs associated with fundraising.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_320_425Financial - DividendThe increase in Interest and Dividend Revenue was primarily driven by net appreciation of investments of which Blackstone owns a share.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_339_456Revenue - ProductOur Credit segment revenues may, however, be negatively impacted by prolonged periods of market pressure, depressed energy prices, market volatility or uncertainty regarding governmental and tax policy.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_61_154Legal - OtherIf a variation of the above described legislation or any other change in the tax laws, rules, regulations or interpretations preclude us from qualifying for treatment as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes under the publicly traded partnership rules or force us to hold interests in entities earning income from carried interest through taxable subsidiary corporations, this could materially increase our tax liability, and could well result in a reduction in the market price of our common units.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_63_165Financial - ExpenseThese contemplated changes, if adopted by individual countries, could increase tax uncertainty andor costs faced by us, our portfolio companies and our investors, change our business model and cause other adverse consequences.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_275_926Other - OtherPerformance Fees, which are determined on a fund by fund basis, were $670.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, a decrease of $87.0 million, compared to $757.0 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, principally due to lower appreciation in BCP V compared to 2015, partially offset by greater appreciation in our BCP VI and BCP IV funds.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_285_354Financial - ExpenseThe increase in Other Operating Expenses was primarily due to non-recurring costs related to the SEC settlement, an increase in interest allocated to the segment and certain one-time costs associated with fundraising.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_280_342Revenue - ProductThe decrease in revenues was attributable to decreases in Performance Fees, Investment Income, and Total Management Fees, Net of $1.2 billion, $105.5 million and $41.6 million, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_289_362Legal - OtherWithin these fund classes, the general partner is subject to equalization such that a the general partner accrues carried interest when the total carried interest for the combined fund classes is positive and b the general partner realizes carried interest so long as clawback obligations, if any, for the combined fund classes are fully satisfied.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_465_660Other - OtherSuch consolidated funds investments are reflected in Investments on the Consolidated Statements of Financial Condition at fair value, with unrealized gains and losses resulting from changes in fair value reflected as a component of Net Gains Losses from Fund Investment Activities in the Consolidated Statements of Operations.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_299_389Financial - ExpenseThe increase was primarily attributable to increases in Performance Fee Compensation, Compensation and Other Operating Expenses of $101.2 million, $27.0 million and $24.8 million, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_363_506Financial - ExpenseWe expect that our primary liquidity needs will be cash to a provide capital to facilitate the growth of our existing businesses which principally includes funding our general partner and co-investment commitments to our funds, b provide capital to facilitate our expansion into new businesses that are complementary, c pay operating expenses, including cash compensation to our employees and other obligations as they arise, d fund modest capital expenditures, e repay borrowings and related interest costs, f pay income taxes, and g make distributions to our unitholders and the holders of Blackstone Holdings Partnership Units.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_318_421Financial - IncomeThe increase in Investment Income was primarily driven by the year over year net appreciation of investments of which Blackstone owns a share.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_437_603Legal - OtherThe actual clawback liability, however, generally does not become realized until the end of a funds life except for certain funds, including certain Blackstone real estate funds, multi-asset class investment funds and credit-focused funds, which may have an interim clawback liability.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_343_468Financial - ExpenseThe increase in Other Operating Expenses was due to fundraising costs, depreciation and interest and other costs allocated to the segment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_109_279Financial - IncomeOther Income Net Gains from Fund Investment Activities was $176.4 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $181.5 million compared to $357.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_501_736Legal - OtherThe actual clawback liability, however, generally does not become realized until the end of a funds life except for certain Blackstone real estate funds, multi-asset class investment funds and credit-focused funds, which may have an interim clawback liability.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_430_582Financial - ExpenseThe amount of the reduction varies by fund, the type of fee paid by the portfolio company and the previously incurred expenses of the fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_30_80Financial - ExpenseThe amount of the reduction varies by fund, the type of fee paid by the portfolio company and the previously incurred expenses of the fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_62_157Other - OtherDepending upon what version of the legislation, if any, were enacted, the potential impact on a public company such as Blackstone in a given year could differ significantly and could be material.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_343_465Financial - ExpenseThe increase in expenses was attributable to increases of $191.3 million and $26.7 million in Total Compensation and Benefits and Other Operating Expenses, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_109_280Financial - Shares / EquityThis decrease was primarily comprised of decreases in our Real Estate, Hedge Fund Solutions and Private Equity segments of $148.3 million, $73.8 million and $62.0 million, respectively, partially offset by an increase of $102.7 million in our Credit segment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_303_396Other - OtherFor the year ended December 31, 2015, the increase in carrying value of assets for Blackstones contributed real estate opportunistic funds was driven by sustained strong operating fundamentals in the private portfolio resulting in appreciation of 16.6% offset by public portfolio depreciation of 8.6%.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_101_252Financial - IncomeThe decrease was primarily attributable to decreases in Performance Fees and Investment Income of $2.6 billion and $329.4 million, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_103_260Financial - IncomeThe decrease in Investment Income was primarily due to decreases in our Real Estate and Private Equity segments of $246.5 million and $105.5 million, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_284_350Other - OtherThe increase was primarily due to the equalization of Base Management Fees for BTAS in the fourth quarter of 2015 whereby, pursuant to the terms of the applicable fund agreements, limited partners coming into the fund were retroactively charged Base Management Fees back to the inception of the fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_71_199Financial - EarningsAdjusted EBITDA represents Distributable Earnings plus the addition of a Interest Expense, b Taxes and Related Payables Including Payable Under Tax Receivable Agreement, and c Depreciation and Amortization.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_6_15MA - OtherWe seek to acquire high quality, well-located yet undermanaged assets at an attractive basis, address any property or business issues through active asset management and sell the assets once our business plan is accomplished.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_13_37Financial - IncomeWe invest in the funds we manage and, in most cases, receive a preferred allocation of income i.e., a carried interest or an incentive fee from an investment fund in the event that specified cumulative investment returns are achieved generally collectively referred to as Performance Fees .
bx_10k_2017-02-24_306_404Financial - ExpenseThe decrease was primarily attributable to a decrease of Performance Fee Compensation of $328.2 million, partially offset by increases in Compensation and Other Operating Expenses of $32.1 million and $33.1 million, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_274_332Revenue - ProductRevenues in the Private Equity segment would likely be negatively impacted if the identification of capital deployment opportunities remained challenging, the capital markets experienced another period of volatility, including as a result of uncertainty regarding governmental and tax policy, or market andor macroeconomic conditions were to deteriorate.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_322_429Financial - ExpenseThe increase was primarily attributable to an $18.6 million increase in Other Operating Expenses.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_15_46Financial - Shares / EquityEquity indices outside the U.S. were mixed, with European and Asian stock indices largely flat on the year MSCI Europe down 0.5% and MSCI Asia up 1.7%, with a notable exception in the U.K. as the FTSE 100 gained 14.4% on the year despite Brexit.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_361_501Other - OtherAs of December 31, 2016, Blackstone had $1.8 billion in cash and cash equivalents, $2.8 billion invested in corporate treasury investments, $2.2 billion invested in Blackstone Funds and other investments, against $3.4 billion in borrowings from our bond issuances, and no borrowings outstanding under our revolving credit facility.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_102_257Other - OtherFor the year ended December 31, 2015, the increase in carrying value of assets for Blackstones contributed real estate opportunistic funds was driven by sustained strong operating fundamentals in the private portfolio resulting in appreciation of 16.6%, offset by public portfolio depreciation of 8.6%, particularly in lodging.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_62_156Other - OtherMultiple versions of legislation in this area have been proposed over the last few years that have included significantly different provisions regarding effective dates and the treatment of invested capital, tiered entities and cross-border operations, among other matters.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_99_247Financial - ExpenseThe decrease in General, Administrative and Other was primarily due to the spin-off of our financial advisory business and non-recurring costs incurred in 2015 related to the SEC settlement.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_329_447Revenue - ProductPerformance Fee Compensation was $25.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $17.1 million compared to $42.2 million for the year ended December 31, 2014 due to the decrease in Performance Fees Revenue.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_10_27Other - OtherThe Hedge Fund Solutions segment also includes investment platforms that seed new hedge fund businesses, purchase minority ownership interests in more established hedge funds, invest in special situation opportunities, create alternative solutions in regulated structures and trade directly.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_184_843Financial - Shares / Equity$16.9 billion in our Private Equity segment primarily related to $8.3 billion raised for Strategic Partners, $3.9 billion raised for core private equity and $2.6 billion raised for Tactical Opportunities, capital raised is included in Fee-Earning Assets Under Management at the investment period commencement of each fund or at such time indicated in each funds limited partnership agreement, and
bx_10k_2017-02-24_322_431Financial - ExpenseThe increase in Other Operating Expenses was primarily due to interest and other expenses allocated to the segment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_339_454Revenue - ProductFollowing a challenging credit market in 2015, which continued through early 2016, revenues in our Credit segment increased in 2016 as compared to 2015, driven by improved performance in our performing debt and distressed debt portfolios, with particularly strong performance in our energy investments.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_285_352Financial - ExpenseThe decrease was primarily attributable to a decrease of $230.1 million in Performance Fee Compensation, slightly offset by a $55.6 million increase in Other Operating Expenses.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_319_423Revenue - ProductThe increase in Other Revenue was primarily driven by an increase in revenue allocations to the segment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_104_266Revenue - ProductThe decrease in Performance Fee Compensation was due to the decrease in Performance Fee Revenue.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_104_268Financial - Shares / EquityThe decrease was partially offset by an increase in equity-based amortization charges due to the 2014 change in terms of Deferred Compensation Plan awards which require future service and are therefore expensed over the service period.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_74_763Financial - Income2015 2014 Dollars in Millions GAAP Income Before Provision for Taxes $2,382 $1,815 $3,987 + Transaction-Related Charges + Amortization of Intangibles - Income Associated with Non-Controlling Interests of Consolidating Entities Economic Income EI = Economic Income $2,481 $2,178 $4,544 - Performance Fee Adjustment - Investment Income Loss Adjustment + Net Interest Loss + Performance Fee Compensation and Benefit Adjustment Fee Related Earnings FRE = Fee Related Earnings $1,003 $936 $1,003 + Net Realized Performance Fees + Realized Investment Income - Net Interest Loss - Taxes and Related Payables Including Payable Under Tax Receivable Agreement + Equity-Based Compensation Distributable Earnings DE $2,176 $3,844 $3,064 = Distributable Earnings
bx_10k_2017-02-24_4_7Financial - Shares / EquityOur corporate private equity business pursues transactions throughout the world across a variety of transaction types, including large buyouts, mid-cap buyouts, buy and build platforms which involve multiple acquisitions behind a single management team and platform and growth equitydevelopment projects which involve significant minority investments in mature companies and greenfield development projects in energy and power.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_104_270Financial - ExpenseDue to the spin-off, partially offsetting these increases was a reduction in expenses directly incurred by the financial advisory business.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_300_934Financial - ExpenseThe increase in Other Operating Expenses was primarily due to an increase in interest and other expenses allocated to the segment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_19_59Other - OtherAggregate Index up 2.6%, investment grade corporates up 6.1%, and high yield corporates up 17.1%.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_285_353Revenue - ProductPerformance Fee Compensation decreased as a result of the decrease in Performance Fees Revenue.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_390_979Financial - EarningsDollars in Thousands 2016 2015 2014 Net Income Attributable to The Blackstone Group L.P. $1,039,235 $709,789 $1,584,589 Net Income Attributable to Non-Controlling Interests in Blackstone Holdings 960,284 683,516 1,701,100 Net Income Attributable to Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities 246,152 219,900 335,070 Net Income Attributable to Redeemable Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities 3,977 11,145 74,794 Net Income $2,249,648 $1,624,350 $3,695,553 Provision for Taxes 132,362 190,398 291,173 Income Before Provision for Taxes $2,382,010 $1,814,748 $3,986,726 Transaction Related Chargesa 264,937 489,563 856,382 Amortization of lntangiblesb 84,466 104,530 111,254 Income Associated with Non-Controlling Interests of Consolidated Entitiesc 250,129 231,045 409,864 Economic Income $2,481,284 $2,177,796 $4,544,498 Taxes d 92,263 27,527 199,512 Economic Net Income $2,389,021 $2,150,269 $4,344,986 Taxes d 92,263 27,527 199,512 Performance Fee Adjustmente 2,177,986 1,798,077 4,391,877 Investment Income Adjustmentf 220,290 52,849 471,628 Net Interest Loss g 51,623 44,181 36,511 Performance Fee Compensation and Benefits Adjustmenth 868,022 564,560 1,285,503 Fee Related Earnings $1,002,653 $935,611 $1,003,007 Net Realized Performance Feesi 1,112,966 2,520,876 1,786,599 ReaIized Investment Incomej 199,869 418,808 543,425 Net Interest Lossg 51,623 44,181 36,511 Taxes and Related Payables Including Payable Under Tax Receivable Agreementk 167,149 90,470 280,788 Equity-Based Compensationl 79,571 103,044 48,226 Distributable Earnings $2,176,287 $3,843,688 $3,063,958 Interest Expense 197,506 175,782 132,855 Taxes and Related Payables Including Payable Under Tax Receivable Agreementk 167,149 90,470 280,788 Depreciation and Amortization 31,971 27,213 32,300 Adjusted EBITDA $2,572,913 $4,137,153 $3,509,901
bx_10k_2017-02-24_317_419Revenue - ProductDespite challenging market conditions in early 2016, demand for products in Hedge Fund Solutions remained strong throughout the year, and the segment operates multiple business lines, manages strategies that are both long and short asset classes and generates a majority of its revenue through management fees, all of which provide a level of downside protection to Hedge Fund Solutions revenues.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_61_153Other - OtherThe federal statutory rate for corporations is currently 35% although Congress is considering proposals to lower that rate, and the state and local tax rates, net of the federal benefit, aggregate approximately 5%.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_160_822Other - Other$4.8 billion in our Credit segment primarily attributable to $1.8 billion from BDCs, $1.6 billion from certain long only strategies and $1.4 billion from hedge fund strategies,
bx_10k_2017-02-24_77_212Other - OtherOur funds of hedge funds, hedge funds and funds structured like hedge funds in our Hedge Fund Solutions, Credit and Real Estate segments generally have structures that afford an investor the right to withdraw or redeem their interests on a periodic basis for example, annually or quarterly, typically with 30 to 95 days notice, depending on the fund and the liquidity profile of the underlying assets.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_123_294Financial - IncomeThe amounts of these items vary directly with the performance of the consolidated Blackstone Funds and largely eliminate the amount of Other Income Net Gains from Fund Investment Activities from the Net Income Loss Attributable to The Blackstone Group L.P.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_329_446Financial - ExpenseThe increase in Other Operating Expenses was primarily due to interest allocated to the segment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_361_500Financial - Cash FlowWe have multiple sources of liquidity to meet our capital needs, including annual cash flows, accumulated earnings in the businesses, the proceeds from our issuances of senior notes, liquid investments we hold on our balance sheet for our own use and access to our $1.5 billion committed revolving credit facility.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_317_417Financial - EarningsIn addition, in the second half of 2016, a significant portion of Hedge Fund Solutions Fee-Earning Assets Under Management eligible for Incentive Fees moved above the high water mark, resulting in approximately 78% of Fee-Earnings Assets Under Management eligible for Incentive Fees being above the high water mark as of the end of the year.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_306_405Revenue - ProductThe decrease in Performance Fee Compensation is the result of a decrease in Performance Fees Revenue.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_113_782Financial - IncomeThe following table reconciles the effective income tax rate to the U.S. federal statutory tax rate:
bx_10k_2017-02-24_299_388Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $995.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $152.9 million, compared to $842.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_322_428Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $313.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $19.2 million compared to the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_343_464Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $489.4 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $218.0 million compared to $271.4 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_329_442Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $294.6 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, an increase of $34.7 million compared to the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_278_337Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $781.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $55.6 million, compared to $726.2 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_407_563Other - OtherA controlling financial interest is defined as a the power to direct the activities of a VIE that most significantly impact the entitys economic performance and b the obligation to absorb losses of the entity or the right to receive benefits from the entity that could potentially be significant to the VIE.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_460_643Financial - Cash FlowReal Estate Investments The fair values of real estate investments are determined by considering projected operating cash flows, sales of comparable assets, if any, and replacement costs among other measures.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_356_495Other - OtherAdditionally, fluctuations in our statement of financial condition also include appreciation or depreciation in Blackstone investments in the Blackstone Funds, additional investments and redemptions of such interests in the Blackstone Funds and the collection of receivables related to management and advisory fees.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_329_445Financial - ExpenseOther Operating Expenses were $90.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, an increase of $3.9 million compared to $86.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_322_430Financial - ExpenseOther Operating Expenses were $108.6 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $18.6 million compared to $90.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_75_205Other - OtherThe alternative asset management business is a complex business that is primarily based on managing third party capital and does not require substantial capital investment to support rapid growth.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_413_577Other - OtherThe range of management fee rates and the calculation base from which they are earned, generally, are as follows:
bx_10k_2017-02-24_71_200Other - OtherSee Liquidity and Capital Resources Sources and Uses of Liquidity below for our calculation of Adjusted EBITDA.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_99_246Financial - Shares / EquityThe decrease in Compensation was due to lower equity-based compensation expense related to awards granted in connection with Blackstones IPO which were fully vested and expensed as of June 30, 2015 as well as the departure of employees due to the October 1, 2015 spin-off of our financial advisory business.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_124_789Financial - EarningsNet Income Attributable to Non-Controlling Interests in Blackstone Holdings is derived from the Income Before Provision for Taxes, excluding the Net Gains from Fund Investment Activities and the percentage allocation of the income between Blackstone Holdings and The Blackstone Group L.P. after considering any contractual arrangements that govern the allocation of income loss such as fees allocable to The Blackstone Group L.P.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_188_847Financial - Shares / Equity$4.8 billion appreciation in our Private Equity segment primarily due to strong fund performance, with an 8.8% overall increase in carrying value, including 10.7% for our Corporate Private Equity funds and 10.9% in Tactical Opportunities,
bx_10k_2017-02-24_62_158Financial - IncomeIn addition, even if these legislative proposals would not themselves impose a tax on a publicly traded partnership such as Blackstone, they could force Blackstone and other publicly traded partnerships to restructure their operations so as to prevent disqualifying income from reaching the publicly traded partnership in amounts that would disqualify the partnership from treatment as a partnership for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_32_82Other - OtherTransaction-based fees are recognized when a there is evidence of an arrangement with a client, b agreed upon services have been provided, c fees are fixed or determinable, and d collection is reasonably assured.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_432_584Other - OtherTransaction-based fees are recognized when a there is evidence of an arrangement with a client, b agreed upon services have been provided, c fees are fixed or determinable, and d collection is reasonably assured.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_328_441Financial - EarningsThis was driven by an increase in Fee-Earning Assets Under Management of 7% from the prior year, which was from net inflows and market appreciation.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_67_190Financial - EarningsBlackstone uses Fee Related Earnings  FRE , which is derived from EI, as a measure to highlight earnings from operations excluding: a the income related to performance fees and related performance fee compensation, b income earned from Blackstones investments in the Blackstone Funds, and c net interest income loss.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_274_328Revenue - ProductRevenues in our Private Equity segment in 2016 were moderately lower compared to 2015, primarily driven by lower Performance Fees from BCP V as a result of modestly lower appreciation and significant realizations in the year.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_180_305Other - OtherTotal Assets Under Management were $366.6 billion at December 31, 2016, an increase of $30.2 billion, or 9%, compared to $336.4 billion at December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_199_307Other - OtherTotal Assets Under Management were $336.4 billion at December 31, 2015, an increase of $46.0 billion, or 16%, compared to $290.4 billion at December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_294_371Revenue - ProductIn 2016, revenues in our Real Estate segment increased primarily due to appreciation in public and private investment holdings in our real estate opportunistic funds and increased management fees primarily from BREP VIII committed capital and BPP invested capital.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_80_217Financial - EarningsOur calculations of assets under management and fee-earning assets under management may differ from the calculations of other asset managers, and as a result this measure may not be comparable to similar measures presented by other asset managers.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_144_299Financial - EarningsFee-Earning Assets Under Management were $277.1 billion at December 31, 2016, an increase of $30.9 billion, or 13%, compared to $246.1 billion at December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_164_301Financial - EarningsFee-Earning Assets Under Management were $246.1 billion at December 31, 2015, an increase of $29.5 billion, or 14%, compared to $216.7 billion at December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_302_393Revenue - ProductThe decrease in revenues was primarily attributable to decreases in Performance Fees and Investment Income of $1.0 billion and $246.5 million, respectively, partially offset by an increase in Total Management Fees, Net of $66.6 million.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_324_433Revenue - ProductThe decrease in revenues was primarily attributable to
bx_10k_2017-02-24_293_370Revenue - ProductThe increase in revenues was primarily attributable to increases in Total Management Fees, Net, Performance Fees and Investment Income of $130.9 million, $129.5 million and $117.9 million, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_37_751Legal - Otheruntil the end of a funds life except for certain funds, including certain Blackstone real estate funds, multi-asset class investment funds and credit-focused funds, which may have an interim clawback liability.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_306_403Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $842.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $263.1 million, compared to $1.1 billion for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_285_351Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $726.2 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $174.7 million, compared to $900.9 million for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_350_479Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $271.4 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $140.4 million compared to $411.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_104_263Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $3.1 billion for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $765.0 million compared to $3.9 billion for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_99_244Financial - ExpenseExpenses were $2.9 billion for the year ended December 31, 2016, a decrease of $162.3 million compared to $3.1 billion for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_289_365Other - OtherBCOM is currently above its carried interest threshold and has generated inception to date positive returns.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_350_481Revenue - ProductThe decrease in Performance Fee Compensation was due to lower Performance Fees Revenue.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_474_699Other - OtherIdentifiable finite-lived intangible assets are amortized on a straight-line basis over their estimated useful lives, ranging from 3 to 20 years, reflecting the contractual lives of such assets.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_276_334Financial - EarningsBase Management Fees were $554.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $51.5 million compared to $502.6 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, primarily due to the addition of Fee-Earning Assets Under Management across the segment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_351_483Other - OtherThe fund returns information reflected in this discussion and analysis is not indicative of the financial performance of The Blackstone Group L.P. and is also not necessarily indicative of the future results of any particular fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_348_475Other - OtherInvestment Loss was $9.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, which were $23.5 million lower compared to the prior year.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_42_107Financial - IncomeCompensation and Benefits  Performance Fee Performance Fee Compensation consists of Carried Interest which may be distributed in cash or in-kind and Incentive Fee allocations, and may in future periods also include allocations of investment income from Blackstones firm investments, to employees and senior managing directors participating in certain profit sharing initiatives.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_444_613Financial - IncomeCompensation and Benefits  Performance Fee Performance Fee Compensation consists of Carried Interest which may be distributed in cash or in-kind and Incentive Fee allocations, and may in future periods also include allocations of investment income from Blackstones firm investments, to employees and senior managing directors participating in certain profit sharing initiatives.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_104_267Financial - Shares / EquityThe decrease in Compensation was primarily due to lower equity-based compensation expense related to awards granted in connection with Blackstones IPO, which were fully vested and expensed as of June 30, 2015 and an overall decrease in headcount driven by the October 1, 2015 spin-off of our financial advisory business.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_99_248Financial - ExpenseThe decrease in Fund Expenses was primarily attributable to our Credit segment as a result of a decrease in certain CLO-related expenses.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_202_860Financial - Debt$29.5 billion in our Real Estate segment attributable to $16.0 billion raised for BREP VIII, $6.9 billion raised for BPP, $1.3 billion raised during the initial closing for the third real estate debt strategies fund, $1.0 billion raised for BXMT, and $740.3 million raised for BREP co-investment,
bx_10k_2017-02-24_472_689Other - OtherIn such circumstances, the Partnership will estimate the fair value in good faith and in a manner that it reasonably chooses, in accordance with the requirements of GAAP.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_382_520Other - OtherAs of December 31, 2016, the amount remaining under this program available for repurchases was $335.8 million.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_123_293Financial - EarningsThe Net Income Attributable to Redeemable Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities and Net Income Attributable to Non-Controlling Interests in Consolidated Entities is attributable to the consolidated Blackstone Funds.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_362_504Other - OtherOur available capital could be adversely affected if there are prolonged periods of few substantial realizations from our investment funds accompanied by substantial capital calls for new investments from those investment funds.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_35_95Other - OtherThe Partnership is not obligated to pay guaranteed returns or hurdles, and therefore, cannot have negative Carried Interest over the life of a fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_436_598Other - OtherThe Partnership is not obligated to pay guaranteed returns or hurdles, and therefore, cannot have negative Carried Interest over the life of a fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_65_175Financial - Incomenot or are not able to make such an election, then a our then-current common unitholders, in the aggregate, could indirectly bear income tax liabilities in excess of the aggregate amount of taxes that would have been due had we elected the alternative procedure, and b a given common unitholder may indirectly bear taxes attributable to income allocable to other common unitholders or former common unitholders, including taxes as well as interest and penalties with respect to periods prior to such holders ownership of common units.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_320_424Financial - DividendInterest and Dividend Revenue was $23.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $5.8 million compared to $17.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_307_409Other - OtherThe fund returns information reflected in this discussion and analysis is not indicative of the financial performance of The Blackstone Group L.P. and is also not necessarily indicative of the future performance of any particular fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_229_317Other - OtherThe fund returns information reflected in this discussion and analysis is not indicative of the financial performance of The Blackstone Group L.P. and is also not necessarily indicative of the future performance of any particular fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_286_356Other - OtherThe fund returns information reflected in this discussion and analysis is not indicative of the financial performance of The Blackstone Group L.P. and is also not necessarily indicative of the future performance of any particular fund.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_3_6Financial - Shares / EquityIn addition, our Private Equity segment includes our opportunistic investment platform that invests globally across asset classes, industries and geographies, Blackstone Tactical Opportunities  Tactical Opportunities , our secondary private equity fund of funds business, Strategic Partners Fund Solutions  Strategic Partners , a multi-asset investment program for eligible high net worth investors offering exposure to certain of Blackstones key illiquid investment strategies through a single commitment, Blackstone Total Alternatives Solutions  BTAS  and our capital markets services business, Blackstone Capital Markets  BXCM .
bx_10k_2017-02-24_63_163Revenue - GeographyThe OECD, which represents a coalition of member countries, is contemplating changes to numerous long-standing tax principles through its base erosion and profit shifting project, which is focused on a number of issues, including the shifting of profits between affiliated entities in different tax jurisdictions, interest deductibility and eligibility for the benefits of double tax treaties.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_208_866Revenue - Geography$4.9 billion net appreciation in our Real Estate segment driven by sustained strong operating fundamentals in the private portfolio resulting in appreciation of 16.6% offset by public portfolio depreciation of 8.6%, and by $1.9 billion of foreign exchange depreciation, and
bx_10k_2017-02-24_71_198Financial - EarningsAdjusted Earnings Before Interest, Taxes and Depreciation and Amortization  Adjusted EBITDA , is a supplemental non-GAAP measure derived from our segment reported results and may be used to assess our ability to service our borrowings.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_356_492Other - OtherFluctuations in our statement of financial condition result primarily from activities of the Blackstone Funds which are consolidated as well as business transactions, such as the issuance of senior notes described below.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_294_373Other - OtherAs a result of less distress and rising asset values compared to late 2015 and early 2016, in the U.S., the second half of 2016 was a more challenging opportunistic investment environment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_329_443Financial - ExpenseThe increase was primarily attributable to a $47.8 million increase in Compensation, and a $3.9 million increase in Other Operating Expenses, partially offset by a $17.1 million decrease in Performance Fee Compensation.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_278_339Revenue - ProductCompensation increased primarily due to the increase in Management Fee Revenue, on which a portion of compensation is based, as well as an increase in headcount to support the growth of the business.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_294_376Revenue - ProductRevenues in our Real Estate segment would likely be negatively impacted if the capital markets experienced a period of prolonged volatility, including as a result of uncertainty regarding governmental and tax policy, or market andor macroeconomic conditions were to deteriorate.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_357_496Other - OtherTotal assets were $26.4 billion as of December 31, 2016, an increase $3.9 billion from December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_319_422Revenue - ProductOther Revenue was $8.2 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $8.0 million compared to $0.2 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_64_172Other - OtherIf a partnership elects the alternative procedure for a given adjustment, the amount of taxes for which its partners would be liable would be increased by any applicable penalties and a special interest charge.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_97_237Financial - IncomeThe increase in Investment Income was primarily due to an increase in our Real Estate segment of $117.9 million.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_282_928Financial - IncomeInvestment Income was $73.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $105.5 million, compared to $178.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2014, primarily due to our BCP V and BCP VI funds which generated strong net returns of 8.1% and 7.9%, respectively, for the year, but were slightly lower than the returns generated in the full year 2014 mainly as a result of the lower returns in our public portfolio.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_64_170Other - OtherSuch audits will continue to be conducted at the partnership level, but with respect to tax returns for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017, and unless a partnership qualifies for and affirmatively elects an alternative procedure, any adjustments to the amount of tax due including interest and penalties will be payable by the partnership.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_98_242Financial - Shares / EquityThe increase in our Private Equity segment was primarily due to the addition of Fee-Earning Assets Under Management across the segment.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_13_39Financial - IncomeNet investment gains and investment income generated by the Blackstone Funds, principally private equity and real estate funds, are driven by value created by our operating and strategic initiatives as well as overall market conditions.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_359_956Revenue - ProductFor the year ended December 31, 2016, we had Total Fee Related Revenues of $2.5 billion and related expenses of $1.5 billion, generating Fee Related Earnings of $1.0 billion and Distributable Earnings of $2.2 billion.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_95_226Revenue - ProductTotal Revenues were $5.1 billion for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $479.3 million, or 10%, compared to $4.6 billion for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_99_250Revenue - ProductThe increase in Performance Fee Compensation was due to the increase in Performance Fees Revenue.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_299_390Revenue - ProductThe increase in Performance Fee Compensation was the result of an increase in Performance Fees Revenue.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_298_387Financial - IncomeThe increase in Investment Income was primarily due to the net appreciation of investments in BREP VI, in which the general partner has made a larger commitment than in other real estate funds.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_293_369Revenue - ProductRevenues were $2.2 billion for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $406.4 million compared to $1.8 billion for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_316_412Revenue - ProductRevenues were $605.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $15.4 million compared to $590.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_338_452Revenue - ProductRevenues were $898.5 million for the year ended December 31, 2016, an increase of $413.7 million compared to $484.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_102_254Financial - Shares / EquityThe decrease in Performance Fees was primarily due to decreases in our Private Equity, Real Estate, and Credit segments of $1.2 billion, $1.0 billion and $270.4 million, respectively.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_478_713Other - OtherIn the normal course of business, we enter into various off-balance sheet arrangements including sponsoring and owning limited or general partner interests in consolidated and non-consolidated funds, entering into derivative transactions, entering into operating leases, and entering into guarantee arrangements.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_431_1003Other - OtherManagement fee offsets are reductions to management fees payable by the limited partners of the Blackstone Funds, which are granted based on the amount such limited partners reimburse the Blackstone Funds for placement fees.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_31_750Other - OtherManagement fee offsets are reductions to management fees payable by the limited partners of the Blackstone Funds, which are granted based on the amount such limited partners reimburse the Blackstone Funds for placement fees.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_7_18Other - OtherBREDS scale and investment mandates enable it to provide a variety of lending and investment options including mezzanine loans, senior loans and liquid securities.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_439_1004Financial - DividendInterest and Dividend Revenue Interest and Dividend Revenue comprises primarily interest and dividend income earned on principal investments held by Blackstone.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_39_752Financial - DividendInterest and Dividend Revenue Interest and Dividend Revenue comprises primarily interest and dividend income earned on principal investments held by Blackstone.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_467_664Financial - DebtThe Partnership has applied the fair value option for certain loans and receivables and certain investments in private debt securities that otherwise would not have been carried at fair value with gains and losses recorded in net income.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_25_70Other - OtherWe manage our business using traditional financial measures and key operating metrics since we believe these metrics measure the productivity of our investment activities.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_345_470Revenue - ProductThe decrease in revenues was primarily attributable to lower Performance Fees and Investment Income of $270.4 million and $23.5 million, respectively, partially offset by an increase of $27.1 million in Total Management Fees, Net.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_201_859Financial - Shares / Equity$30.0 billion in our Private Equity segment primarily related to $18.0 billion raised for the seventh private equity fund the corresponding Fee-Earning Assets Under Management Inflow will occur when the investment period for this fund commences, $7.0 billion raised for Tactical Opportunities, $2.2 billion raised from Strategic Partners and $714.2 million of inflows from BTAS,
bx_10k_2017-02-24_20_64Revenue - GeographyThe Peoples Bank of China enacted a number of measures intended to stimulate the economy, including infrastructure spending, easing of property restrictions and auto incentives.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_53_124Financial - IncomeIn addition, certain of the wholly owned subsidiaries of the Partnership and the Blackstone Holdings Partnerships will be subject to federal, state and local corporate income taxes at the entity level and the related tax provision attributable to the Partnerships share of this income tax is reflected in the Consolidated Financial Statements.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_273_326Revenue - ProductRevenues were $1.4 billion for the year ended December 31, 2016, a decrease of $21.6 million compared to $1.4 billion for the year ended December 31, 2015.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_280_341Revenue - ProductRevenues were $1.4 billion for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $1.4 billion compared to $2.7 billion for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_302_392Revenue - ProductRevenues were $1.8 billion for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $1.2 billion compared to $3.0 billion for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_324_432Revenue - ProductRevenues were $590.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, a decrease of $67.5 million compared to $657.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2014.
bx_10k_2017-02-24_283_348Other - OtherBase Management Fees were $502.6 million for the year ended December 31, 2015, an increase of $86.8 million compared to $415.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2014, primarily due to the increase in the funds raised for Tactical Opportunities and Strategic Partners.





Click to view a specific section in this 10-K Report
View entire 10-K Report
Consolidated Statements Of Financial Condition
Consolidated Statements Of Financial Condition (parenthetical)
Consolidated Statements Of Operations
Consolidated Statements Of Comprehensive Income
Consolidated Statement Of Changes In Partners' Capital
Consolidated Statements Of Cash Flows
Organization
Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies
Goodwill And Intangible Assets
Investments
Net Asset Value As Fair Value
Derivative Financial Instruments
Fair Value Option
Fair Value Measurements Of Financial Instruments
Variable Interest Entities
Reverse Repurchase And Repurchase Agreements
Other Assets And Accounts Payable, Accrued Expenses And Other Liabilities
Offsetting Of Assets And Liabilities
Borrowings
Income Taxes
Net Income Per Common Unit
Equity-based Compensation
Related Party Transactions
Commitments And Contingencies
Employee Benefit Plans
Regulated Entities
Segment Reporting
Subsequent Events
Quarterly Financial Data (unaudited)
Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies (policies)
Goodwill And Intangible Assets (tables)
Investments (tables)
Net Asset Value As Fair Value (tables)
Derivative Financial Instruments (tables)
Fair Value Option (tables)
Fair Value Measurements Of Financial Instruments (tables)
Variable Interest Entities (tables)
Reverse Repurchase And Repurchase Agreements (tables)
Other Assets And Accounts Payable, Accrued Expenses And Other Liabilities (tables)
Offsetting Of Assets And Liabilities (tables)
Borrowings (tables)
Income Taxes (tables)
Net Income Per Common Unit (tables)
Equity-based Compensation (tables)
Related Party Transactions (tables)
Commitments And Contingencies (tables)
Segment Reporting (tables)
Quarterly Financial Data (unaudited) (tables)
Organization - Additional Information (detail)
Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies - Additional Information (detail)
Goodwill And Intangible Assets - Additional Information (detail)
Intangible Assets, Net (detail)
Changes In Partnership's Intangible Assets, Net (detail)
Investments (detail)
Investments - Additional Information (detail)
Reconciliation Of Realized And Net Change In Unrealized Gains (losses) To Other Income (loss) - Net Gains (losses) From Fund Investment Activities In Condensed Consolidated Statements Of Operations (detail)
Summarized Financial Information Of Partnership's Equity Method Investments (detail)
Realized And Net Change In Unrealized Gains (losses) On Investments Held By Blackstone's Treasury Cash Management Strategies (detail)
Performance Fees Allocated To Funds (detail)
Realized And Net Change In Unrealized Gains (losses) On Investments (detail)
Summary Of Fair Value By Strategy Type Alongside Consolidated Funds Of Hedge Funds' Remaining Unfunded Commitments And Ability To Redeem Such Investments (detail)
Summary Of Fair Value By Strategy Type Alongside Consolidated Funds Of Hedge Funds' Remaining Unfunded Commitments And Ability To Redeem Such Investments (parenthetical) (detail)
Derivative Financial Instruments - Additional Information (detail)
Summary Of Aggregate Notional Amount And Fair Value Of Derivative Financial Instruments (detail)
Summary Of Impact Of Derivative Financial Instruments To Consolidated Statements Of Operations (detail)
Summary Of Financial Instruments For Which Fair Value Option Has Been Elected (detail)
Realized And Net Change In Unrealized Gains (losses) On Financial Instruments On Financial Instruments On Which Fair Value Option Was Elected (detail)
Information For Financial Instruments On Which Fair Value Option Was Elected (detail)
Information For Financial Instruments On Which Fair Value Option Was Elected (parenthetical) (detail)
Fair Value Option - Additional Information (detail)
Financial Assets And Liabilities At Fair Value (detail)
Summary Of Fair Value Transfers Between Level I And Level Ii (detail)
Summary Of Quantitative Inputs And Assumptions For Items Categorized In Level Iii Of Fair Value Hierarchy (detail)
Summary Of Changes In Financial Assets Measured At Fair Value For Which Level Iii Inputs Were Used (detail)
Summary Of Changes In Financial Liabilities Measured At Fair Value For Which Level Iii Inputs Were Used (detail)
Summary Of Changes In Financial Liabilities Measured At Fair Value For Which Level Iii Inputs Were Used (parenthetical) (detail)
Assets And Liabilities Related To Interest In Non-consolidated Vies And Maximum Exposure To Loss (detail)
Reverse Repurchase And Repurchase Agreements - Additional Information (detail)
Schedule Of Repurchase Agreements Obligation By Type Of Collateral Pledged (detail)
Components Of Other Assets (detail)
Other Assets And Accounts Payable, Accrued Expenses And Other Liabilities - Additional Information (detail)
Offsetting Of Assets And Liabilities (detail)
Offsetting Of Assets And Liabilities - Additional Information (detail)
Partnership Credit Facilities (detail)
Partnership Credit Facilities (parenthetical) (detail)
Carrying Value And Fair Value Of Blackstone Issued Notes (detail)
Carrying Value And Fair Value Of Blackstone Issued Notes (parenthetical) (detail)
Partnership's Borrowings Through Consolidated Clo Vehicles (detail)
Senior Secured Notes And Subordinated Notes (detail)
Borrowings - Additional Information (detail)
Scheduled Principal Payments For Borrowings (detail)
Income Taxes - Additional Information (detail)
Provision (benefit) For Income Taxes (detail)
Summary Of Tax Positions (detail)
Reconciliations Of Effective Income Tax Rate To Federal Statutory Tax Rate (detail)
Summary Of Tax Effects Of Temporary Differences (detail)
Unrecognized Tax Benefits Excluding Related Interest And Penalties (detail)
Basic And Diluted Net Income Per Common Unit (detail)
Summary Of Anti-dilutive Securities (detail)
Net Income Per Common Unit - Additional Information (detail)
Equity-based Compensation - Additional Information (detail)
Summary Of Status Of Partnership's Unvested Equity-based Awards (detail)
Unvested Units, After Expected Forfeitures (detail)
Due From Affiliates And Due To Affiliates (detail)
Related Party Transactions - Additional Information (detail)
Commitments And Contingencies - Additional Information (detail)
Aggregate Minimum Future Payments, Net Of Sublease Income, Required On Operating Leases (detail)
Clawback Obligations By Segment (detail)
Employee Benefit Plans - Additional Information (detail)
Regulated Entities - Additional Information (detail)
Segment Reporting - Additional Information (detail)
Financial Data Of Segments (detail)
Reconciliation Of Total Segments To Income (loss) Before Provision For Taxes And Total Assets (detail)
Reconciliation Of Total Segments To Income (loss) Before Provision For Taxes And Total Assets (parenthetical) (detail)
Quarterly Financial Data (detail)


 Please wait while we load the requested 10-K Annual report. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                         https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098d10k.htm




Companies may provide additional information to their SEC Filings as exhibits. Click a link below to view an exhibit that was filed with this report:


                    Exhibit 10.82 - MATERIAL CONTRACT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098dex1082.htm



                    Exhibit 10.83 - MATERIAL CONTRACT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098dex1083.htm



                    Exhibit 21.1 - SUBSIDARIES OF THE REGISTRANT
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098dex211.htm



                    Exhibit 23.1 - CONSENTS OF EXPERTS AND COUNSEL
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098dex231.htm



                    Exhibit 31.1 - RULE 13A-14A/15D-14A CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098dex311.htm



                    Exhibit 31.2 - RULE 13A-14A/15D-14A CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098dex312.htm



                    Exhibit 32.1 - SECTION 1350 CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098dex321.htm



                    Exhibit 32.2 - SECTION 1350 CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1393818/000119312517056300/d280098dex322.htm






Form Type: Annual
Number of times amended: 0
Accession Number: 0001193125-17-056300
Submitted to the SEC: Friday, February 24, 2017
Accepted by the SEC: Friday, February 24, 2017
Period Ending: December 2016








Financial Ratios
Intrinsic Value
Financial Stability

















Companies

 Add



BX




Positive and negative sentiment analysis is available in these filings:

10-Q May 2017
10-K February 2017
10-Q November 2016

[x] close



8-K Latest EarningsJuly 2017


10-K
10-Q




10-K Annual ReportFebruary 2017







10-Q Quarterly ReportMay 2017


10-Q Quarterly ReportNovember 2016


10-Q Quarterly ReportAugust 2016


10-Q Quarterly ReportMay 2016
 


Blackstone Group L.P.

	$34.49 -0.06 (-0.17%)
	
Day's Range:
$34.47 to $34.95
	
52-Week Range:
	$23.33 to $35.09
Volume:
	5,502,016
Volume (Avg):
	4,625,430
Earnings per Share:
	$1.93
PEG / Short / PE Ratios:
	0.56 / 3.67 / 17.07
Market Cap:
	$22.27B
Book Value:
	10.25
EBITDA:
	$0.00



































ISDA - International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.































 | 0 

Log In

|
Create Account







ISDA®
Safe, Efficient Markets
                











Home

Functional Areas



Legal & Documentation





Recent Documents

Traditional Adherence Protocols

Opinions

Amicus Briefs

Determinations Committees






Public Policy



United States

Europe



Financial Law Reform








Risk Management



Risk Management














Market Infrastructure and Technology



Credit Derivatives

Equity Derivatives

Interest Rates

Commodity Derivatives

Collateral

G20 Objectives






Research



Surveys

Studies

Research Notes






ISDA WGMR Implementation

Accounting & Tax

Symbology

Protocol Management

Data, Reporting and FpML






Asset Classes



Credit Derivatives /   Credit Default Swaps

Equity Derivatives

Interest Rates Derivatives

FX Derivatives

Energy, Commodities, Developing Products

Structured Products and Other






Regions



Asia-Pacific

Canada

CEE/SEE/CIS, Middle East, Africa

Europe

Japan

Latin America

United States






Committees



Legal

Global Policy

Capital, Risk, Margin and Collateral

Market Infrastructure and Technology (MIT)

Clearing

Data

Trading

ISDA Non-Cleared Margin Initiative

Determinations Committees

IIGC






Conferences



Conference Schedule

Accreditation

ISDA On Demand

ISDA AGM

2017 ISDA Regional Conferences






Newsroom



Press Releases

Webcasts & Videos

Speeches & Testimonies

derivatiViews

media.comment

CommodityFACT.org

ISDA dailyLead

ISDA In Review

Media  Contacts

IQ: ISDA Quarterly






Bookstore



Bookstore

My Online Library






Membership



Member Types

Member Benefits

Application

ISDA Members






About



About ISDA

Board of Directors

Executives

Mission Statement

ISDA By-Laws

Member Competition Policy

ISDA Overview

Contact Us


















Home

Functional Areas

Protocol Management

ISDA March 2013 DF Protocol

Adhering Parties
















Legal & Documentation

Opinions


Determinations Committees


Standard Terms


Disclosures


Amicus Briefs


Eurozone Contingency Planning


Russia and Ukraine-related sanctions


Brexit




Public Policy

United States


Europe


Asia-Pacific


Japan


Global


Supporting G20 Objectives


Financial Law Reform


OTC Derivatives Compliance Calendar




Risk Management


Market Infrastructure and Technology 

Market Infrastructure and Technology


Credit Derivatives


Equity Derivatives


Interest Rates


Commodity Derivatives


FX Derivatives


Collateral


Settlements


G20 Objectives


ISDA Industry Governance Committee (IIGC)




Research

Surveys


Studies


Research Notes


Discussion Papers


OTC Derivatives Data Sources




ISDA WGMR Implementation Initiative

ISDA Webcast: Preparing for WGMR Implementation 


ISDA 2016 Variation Margin Protocol 


ISDA SIMM Licensed Vendors


ISDA Regulatory Margin Self-Disclosure Letter 


Videos: Preparing for the Variation Margin Rules




Accounting & Tax

International Financial Reporting Standards


US Generally Accepted Accounting Principles


National and International Tax Issues


FATCA




Symbology


Protocol Management

About ISDA Protocols


Open Protocols


Submit Adherence Letter


My Protocol Orders


Traditional Adherence Protocols


Closed Protocols


ISDA Standard Adherence & Refund Policy




Data, Reporting and FpML

Data and Reporting


Clearing Connectivity Standard (CCS)


FpML










Adhering Parties

Adhere to this Protocol

Protocol Name: ISDA March 2013 DF Protocol
Last Updated: July 26, 2017
Number of Parties: 19771





*
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z



Download protocol data



						#
						ParticipantMethod 1Method 2Method 3Method 4Last SubmissionAcceptance Date
501
Bingham ABC, L.P.

July 06, 2016July 07, 2016
502
Bingham TE, L.P.

July 06, 2016July 07, 2016
503
Bio Energy (UK) Ltd

September 14, 2014September 15, 2014
504
Bio Energy (US), LLC

November 07, 2014November 07, 2014
505
Bio-Rad Laboratories, Inc.

June 11, 2013June 11, 2013
506
BioCryst Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

February 04, 2014February 04, 2014
507
Biogen Idec Inc

May 29, 2013May 29, 2013
508
Biogen Idec International GmbH

May 29, 2013May 29, 2013
509
Biogen Idec MA Inc

May 29, 2013May 29, 2013
510
BioMarin International Limited

May 08, 2015May 11, 2015
511
BioMarin Nederland B.V.

June 22, 2015June 23, 2015
512
BioMarin Pharmaceutical Inc

May 08, 2015May 11, 2015
513
BioMed Realty, L.P.

July 18, 2013July 18, 2013
514
bioMerieux, Inc.

May 23, 2013May 23, 2013
515
Biomet, Inc.

June 18, 2013June 19, 2013
516
Bioplan USA, Inc.

July 23, 2015July 23, 2015
517
BioUrja Trading, LLC

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
518
Bioverativ Inc.

March 30, 2017March 30, 2017
519
Birch Grove Capital LP

January 13, 2015January 13, 2015
520
Birch Grove Credit Strategies Master Fund LP

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
521
Birch Run Capital Partners, LP

May 18, 2017May 18, 2017
522
Bird 2000, LP

April 23, 2013April 24, 2013
523
Birdsboro Power LLC

January 06, 2017January 06, 2017
524
Birkenstock USA LP

August 19, 2013August 20, 2013
525
Bishop Rock Capital, L.P.

February 13, 2015February 13, 2015
526
Bishops House London LLC

August 18, 2015August 18, 2015
527
Bishopsgate LLC

August 11, 2016August 11, 2016
528
BISSELL Homecare Inc.

June 03, 2013June 03, 2013
529
BISSELL International Trading Company B.V.

June 03, 2013June 03, 2013
530
BISSELL, Inc.

June 03, 2013June 03, 2013
531
Biwa Fund Limited

October 07, 2013October 07, 2013
532
BJ's Wholesale Club, Inc.

November 27, 2013November 27, 2013
533
BJC Health System

December 20, 2013December 20, 2013
534
BK Medical ApS

February 02, 2016February 02, 2016
535
BK Property Four, LLC

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
536
BK Property Three, LLC

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
537
Black & Decker (Overseas) GmbH

June 28, 2013June 28, 2013
538
Black & Decker Asia Manufacturing Holdings 1 Sarl

June 13, 2014June 16, 2014
539
Black & Decker Asia Pacific (Malaysia) Sdn. Bhd.

June 28, 2013June 28, 2013
540
Black & Decker de Colombia S.A.S.

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
541
Black & Decker Europe

June 20, 2013June 20, 2013
542
Black & Decker Holdings, LLC

June 20, 2013June 20, 2013
543
Black & Decker Inc.

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
544
Black & Decker International Holdings B.V./S.A R.L. - Irish Branch

June 20, 2013June 20, 2013
545
Black & Decker Limited S.a.r.l.

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
546
Black & Decker Luxembourg S.ar.L

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
547
Black & Veatch Holding Company

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
548
Black Box Corporation

July 03, 2013July 03, 2013
549
Black Cat Football, LLC

October 17, 2014October 17, 2014
550
Black Diamond Minerals, LLC.

May 21, 2013May 21, 2013
551
Black Diamond Resources, LLC

June 18, 2013June 19, 2013
552
Black Elk Energy Offshore Operations LLC

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
553
Black Hills Corporation

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
554
Black Hills Wyoming

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
555
Black Knight InfoServ, LLC

September 30, 2015September 30, 2015
556
Black Maple Capital Management LP

August 26, 2013August 26, 2013
557
Black River Asset Management LLC

May 21, 2013May 21, 2013
558
Black Stone Minerals Company, L.P.

June 13, 2013June 13, 2013
559
Black Stone Natural Resources II, L.P.

June 13, 2013June 13, 2013
560
black-and-white Capital LP

September 23, 2016September 23, 2016
561
Blackbaud, Inc.

June 20, 2013June 20, 2013
562
Blackbeard Operating LLC

August 25, 2015August 25, 2015
563
BlackBerry Limited

September 25, 2013September 25, 2013
564
Blackbird Infrastructure 407 General Partnership

March 06, 2015March 06, 2015
565
Blackboard Inc.

June 01, 2015June 01, 2015
566
BlackBrush Oil & Gas, L.P. 

July 25, 2014July 25, 2014
567
BlackGold Capital Management, LP

July 11, 2014July 11, 2014
568
Blackrock Europe Parallel Property Fund II L.P.

October 31, 2013October 31, 2013
569
BlackRock European CLO I Designated Activity Company

February 19, 2016February 22, 2016
570
BlackRock European CLO II Designated Activity Company 

December 14, 2016December 14, 2016
571
Blackstone / GSO Capital Solutions Fund LP

June 24, 2013June 25, 2013
572
Blackstone / GSO Capital Solutions Overseas Master Fund L.P.

June 24, 2013June 25, 2013
573
Blackstone / GSO Debt Funds Management Europe Limited

September 17, 2014September 18, 2014
574
Blackstone / GSO Long-Short Credit Income Fund

June 24, 2013June 25, 2013
575
Blackstone / GSO Market Neutral Credit Master Fund L.P.

June 24, 2013June 25, 2013
576
Blackstone Alternative Asset Management L.P.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
577
Blackstone Alternative Investment Advisors LLC

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
578
Blackstone Alternative Solutions L.L.C.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
579
Blackstone Asia Property Partners – AD L.P.

July 27, 2015July 27, 2015
580
Blackstone Asia Property Partners – AD-NQ L.P.

July 27, 2015July 27, 2015
581
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman II) VI L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
582
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) IV L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
583
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) V L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
584
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) VI BK-A L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
585
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) VI BK-B L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
586
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) VI IT-A L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
587
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) VI IT-B L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
588
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) VI IT-C L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
589
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) VI L.P.

November 05, 2013November 06, 2013
590
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) VII L.P.

July 24, 2017July 24, 2017
591
Blackstone Capital Partners (Cayman) VII NQ L.P.

December 08, 2016December 08, 2016
592
Blackstone CMBS Holdings - G L.P.

May 15, 2016May 16, 2016
593
Blackstone CMBS Holdings Non-IG L.P.

January 24, 2017January 24, 2017
594
Blackstone Holdings Finance Co. L.L.C.

April 11, 2013April 11, 2013
595
Blackstone Mortgage Trust, Inc.

April 23, 2015April 24, 2015
596
Blackstone NWI Asset Management L.L.C.

August 14, 2014August 14, 2014
597
Blackstone Property Partners Europe F L.P.

June 28, 2016June 28, 2016
598
Blackstone Property Partners Europe L.P.

June 28, 2016June 28, 2016
599
Blackstone Property Partners Global – NJ L.P. 

October 21, 2015October 22, 2015
600
Blackstone Property Partners Global – NJ-NQ L.P.

October 23, 2015October 23, 2015
601
Blackstone Property Partners International - A II L.P.

May 16, 2017May 16, 2017
602
Blackstone Property Partners International - A L.P.

August 05, 2015August 05, 2015
603
Blackstone Property Partners International - A-NQ L.P.

August 05, 2015August 05, 2015
604
Blackstone Property Partners L.P.

October 21, 2015October 22, 2015
605
Blackstone Property Partners Lower Fund 1 L.P.

October 23, 2015October 23, 2015
606
Blackstone Property Partners Lower Fund 1 L.P.

December 14, 2015December 15, 2015
607
Blackstone Property Partners Lower Fund 2 L.P.

October 23, 2015October 23, 2015
608
Blackstone Property Partners Lower Fund 2 L.P.

December 14, 2015December 15, 2015
609
Blackstone Real Estate CMBS Master Fund Ltd.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
610
Blackstone Real Estate Debt Strategies High-Grade L.P.

July 07, 2017July 07, 2017
611
Blackstone Real Estate Debt Strategies II L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
612
Blackstone Real Estate Debt Strategies III - Gaussian L.P.

June 28, 2016June 28, 2016
613
Blackstone Real Estate Debt Strategies III L.P.

June 28, 2016June 28, 2016
614
Blackstone Real Estate Debt Strategies III-N L.P.

April 12, 2017April 12, 2017
615
Blackstone Real Estate Income Master Fund

March 21, 2014March 21, 2014
616
Blackstone Real Estate Partners (Offshore) VII L.P.

November 03, 2015November 03, 2015
617
Blackstone Real Estate Partners (Offshore) VII-NQ L.P.

November 11, 2016November 11, 2016
618
Blackstone Real Estate Partners (Offshore) VIII L.P.

May 16, 2016May 16, 2016
619
Blackstone Real Estate Partners (Offshore) VIII-NQ L.P.

April 07, 2017April 07, 2017
620
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Account – C L.P. formerly known as Blackstone Real Estate Investment Partners - C L.P.

May 23, 2017May 24, 2017
621
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Asia Holding (NQ) L.P.

October 26, 2015October 27, 2015
622
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Asia Holding-NQ II L.P.

June 22, 2015June 23, 2015
623
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Asia Holding-NQ III L.P.

October 21, 2015October 21, 2015
624
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Asia L.P.

November 06, 2015November 06, 2015
625
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Asia-NQ L.P.

April 07, 2017April 07, 2017
626
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe III L.P.

July 07, 2017July 07, 2017
627
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe IV L.P.

July 17, 2014July 17, 2014
628
Blackstone Real Estate Partners Europe V L.P.

February 29, 2016February 29, 2016
629
Blackstone Real Estate Partners VII L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
630
Blackstone Real Estate Partners VIII L.P.

November 06, 2015November 06, 2015
631
Blackstone Real Estate SG (NQ) Cayman Co-Investment L.P.

October 26, 2015October 27, 2015
632
Blackstone Real Estate SG (NQ) Cayman L.P.

March 10, 2016March 10, 2016
633
Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Advisors L.L.C.

December 17, 2014December 18, 2014
634
Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Europe L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
635
Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Europe.1 L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
636
Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Fund - Gaussian L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
637
Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Fund L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
638
Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Holdings II L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
639
Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Holdings L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
640
Blackstone Real Estate Special Situations Partnership - SMD L.P.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
641
Blackstone Senfina Advisors L.L.C.

August 22, 2014August 22, 2014
642
Blackstone Tactical Opportunities Fund II (Cayman) L.P

May 06, 2015May 06, 2015
643
Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2014 L.P.

June 15, 2015June 16, 2015
644
Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2015 I L.P.

June 16, 2015June 16, 2015
645
Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution 2016 L.P.

April 13, 2017April 13, 2017
646
BLACKSTONE TOTAL ALTERNATIVES SOLUTION OFFSHORE 2015 I L.P.

September 25, 2015September 28, 2015
647
BLACKSTONE TOTAL ALTERNATIVES SOLUTION OFFSHORE-NQ 2015 I L.P.

September 25, 2015September 28, 2015
648
Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution-NQ 2014 L.P.

November 19, 2014November 19, 2014
649
Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution-NQ 2015 I L.P.

June 15, 2015June 16, 2015
650
Blackstone Total Alternatives Solution-NQ 2016 L.P.

April 13, 2017April 13, 2017
651
Blackstone Treasury Holdings III L.L.C.

December 04, 2014December 05, 2014
652
Blackstone Treasury Solutions Master Fund L.P.

June 27, 2013June 28, 2013
653
Blackwater Capital Management, LLC

September 23, 2014September 23, 2014
654
Blackwater Cayman Fund Limited

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
655
Blackwell BMC, LLC

July 24, 2013July 25, 2013
656
Blackwell Partners LLC

June 03, 2013June 03, 2013
657
Blackwell Partners LLC - Series B

January 09, 2015January 09, 2015
658
Blackwell Partners LLC - Series D

August 30, 2016August 30, 2016
659
Blackwell Partners LLC - Series E

April 05, 2016April 05, 2016
660
Blackwells Capital LLC

February 09, 2017February 13, 2017
661
Blair Franklin Asset Management Inc.

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
662
Blair MCAP LLC

January 15, 2015January 15, 2015
663
Blakeney Fund Limited

October 07, 2013October 07, 2013
664
BLC Textiles, Inc.

June 08, 2015June 08, 2015
665
Blenheim Fund Management, LLC

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
666
BLISS SPORTS, LC

July 17, 2013July 18, 2013
667
Block 17 Holdings, LLC

February 12, 2014February 12, 2014
668
Block 500 Newport Center Drive LLC

October 08, 2014October 08, 2014
669
Blockhouse Capital Management LP

September 22, 2016September 22, 2016
670
Blok 67 Associates doo Beograd

August 31, 2016August 31, 2016
671
Bloom Brands Holdings I C.V.

November 23, 2015November 23, 2015
672
Bloom Tree Partners, LLC

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
673
Bloom Tree Partners, LLC

December 21, 2016December 21, 2016
674
Bloomberg Finance L.P.

June 06, 2013June 06, 2013
675
Bloomberg Inc.

June 06, 2013June 06, 2013
676
Bloomberg L.P.

June 06, 2013June 06, 2013
677
Bloomberg Walbrook M.M. LLC

June 06, 2013June 06, 2013
678
Bloomin' Brands, Inc.

September 11, 2013September 11, 2013
679
Blount County Public Building Authority

December 13, 2013December 16, 2013
680
Blount, Inc.

June 21, 2013June 24, 2013
681
BLS Properties, LLC

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
682
Blue Alpha A24

October 24, 2013October 24, 2013
683
Blue Bird Body Co.

July 01, 2014July 01, 2014
684
Blue Coat Holdings, Inc.

June 17, 2015June 17, 2015
685
Blue Cross of California

January 29, 2015January 30, 2015
686
Blue Fire Capital, LLC

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
687
Blue Harbour Group LP

July 31, 2013July 31, 2013
688
Blue Helm Capital Management, LP

August 10, 2015August 10, 2015
689
Blue Helm Global Macro Master Fund LP

February 06, 2015February 06, 2015
690
Blue Hills Bank

June 06, 2013June 06, 2013
691
Blue Hills Fuels, LLC

November 15, 2016November 16, 2016
692
Blue Isles Futures Fund Limited 

August 04, 2015August 04, 2015
693
Blue Ocean Industrial Gases Co., Ltd

June 05, 2013June 06, 2013
694
Blue Ridge Limited Partnership

June 06, 2013June 06, 2013
695
Blue Ridge Long Fund, LP

December 03, 2015December 03, 2015
696
Blue Ridge Long Intermediate Fund, LP

December 03, 2015December 03, 2015
697
Blue Ridge Long Master Fund, LP

December 03, 2015December 03, 2015
698
Blue Ridge Offshore Master Limited Partnership

June 06, 2013June 06, 2013
699
Blue River Asset Management, LLC

April 29, 2015April 29, 2015
700
Blue Rock Assets Ltd.

April 25, 2013April 25, 2013
701
Blue Rock Capital Fund, L.P.

March 18, 2014March 18, 2014
702
Blue Rock Core Equity Portable Alpha Fund I, L.P.

June 21, 2013June 21, 2013
703
Blue Rock Core Fixed Income Portable Alpha Fund II, L.P.

June 21, 2013June 21, 2013
704
Blue Rock Liquid Alpha Fund, L.P.

July 02, 2013July 02, 2013
705
Blue Rock Long Duration Plus Fund, L.P.

September 08, 2014September 09, 2014
706
Blue Sky West Portfolio, LLC

July 14, 2015July 14, 2015
707
Blue Tip Energy Wyoming, Inc.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
708
BLUE/WP SAN DIEGO, L.L.C.

October 16, 2014October 16, 2014
709
BlueBay Asset Management LLP

June 20, 2013June 20, 2013
710
BlueCrest Capital International Master Fund Limited

September 24, 2013September 25, 2013
711
BlueCrest Emerging Markets Master Fund Limited

October 09, 2013October 09, 2013
712
BlueCrest Equity Strategies Master Fund Limited

December 20, 2013December 20, 2013
713
BlueCrest Managed Futures Master Fund Limited

June 25, 2014June 25, 2014
714
BlueCrest Mercantile Master Fund Limited

April 30, 2014April 30, 2014
715
BlueCrest Mortgage Strategies Master Fund Limited

May 13, 2015May 13, 2015
716
BlueCrest Multi Strategy Credit Master Fund Limited

September 24, 2013September 25, 2013
717
BlueCrest Volatility Arbitrage Master Fund Limited

June 18, 2013June 18, 2013
718
Bluefin Trading, LLC

November 07, 2013November 07, 2013
719
Bluegrass Generation Company, LLC

May 30, 2013May 31, 2013
720
BlueMar Azul Master Fund, Ltd

February 03, 2017February 03, 2017
721
BlueMar Master Fund, Ltd.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
722
BlueMatrix Master Fund Limited

April 30, 2014April 30, 2014
723
BlueMountain Capital Management, LLC

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
724
BlueMountain Long Short Grasmoor Fund Ltd

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
725
Bluestem Energy Assets, LLC

September 26, 2013September 27, 2013
726
Bluestone Resources

December 28, 2015December 29, 2015
727
BlueTrend 2x Leveraged Master Fund Limited

April 30, 2014April 30, 2014
728
BlueTrend Master Fund Limited

April 30, 2014April 30, 2014
729
Blyth, Inc.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
730
BMC Software Asia Pacific Pte. Ltd.

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
731
BMC Software Distribution BV

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
732
BMC Software Finance, Inc.

August 02, 2013August 02, 2013
733
BMC Software Israel Ltd.

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
734
BMC Software, Inc.

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
735
BMO Asset Management Corp.

December 12, 2014December 12, 2014
736
BMO ASSET MANAGMENT INC.

February 14, 2014February 14, 2014
737
BMO Harris Bank National Association

May 14, 2013May 14, 2013
738
BMS Forex Company

June 20, 2013June 20, 2013
739
BMW Canada Inc.

May 22, 2014May 22, 2014
740
BMW Receivables Limited Partnership

May 22, 2014May 23, 2014
741
BMW US Capital,  LLC

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
742
BNK Petroleum (US) Inc

February 03, 2015February 03, 2015
743
BNP Paribas

May 20, 2013May 20, 2013
744
BNP Paribas Asset Management, Inc.

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
745
BNP Paribas Fortis NV/SA

August 19, 2013August 19, 2013
746
BNY Mellon Absolute Insight Funds, Inc. - BNY Mellon Absolute Insight Multi-Strategy Fund

May 01, 2015May 01, 2015
747
BNY Mellon Alcentra Multi-Strategy Credit Fund, Inc.

March 11, 2015March 11, 2015
748
BNY Mellon ARX Brazil Fund, SPC - Long Short Segregated Portfolio

April 24, 2013April 25, 2013
749
BNY Mellon ARX Brazil Fund, SPC - Long Term Segregated Portfolio

March 13, 2014March 13, 2014
750
BNY Mellon ARX Brazil Fund, SPC - Macro Segregated Portfolio

April 24, 2013April 25, 2013
751
BNY Mellon ARX, SPC - Hedge Class Segregated Portfolio

April 24, 2013April 25, 2013
752
BNY Mellon Enhanced Co-efficient Select Fund

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
753
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon Bond Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
754
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon Corporate Bond Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
755
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon Intermediate Bond Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
756
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon Massachusetts Intermediate Municipal Bond Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
757
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon Municipal Opportunities Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
758
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon National Intermediate Municipal Bond Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
759
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon National Short-Term Municipal Bond Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
760
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon New York Intermediate Tax-Exempt Bond Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
761
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon Pennsylvania Intermediate Municipal Bond Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
762
BNY Mellon Funds Trust - BNY Mellon Short-Term U.S. Government Securities Fund

June 21, 2013June 26, 2013
763
BNY Mellon Global Funds, plc

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
764
BNY Mellon Offshore Currency Opportunity Emhanced UK Equitized

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
765
BNY Mellon Offshore Currency Opportunity Enhanced Master Fund

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
766
BNYM Brazil International Fund SPC on behalf of JGP Offshore Segregated Portfolio

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
767
Board of Directors of City Trusts

September 30, 2014September 30, 2014
768
Board of Education of the City of Chicago

April 30, 2015April 30, 2015
769
Board of Regents of Eastern Michigan University

May 12, 2015May 12, 2015
770
Board of Regents of The University of Texas System

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
771
Board of Trustees of Riverview Hospital

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
772
Boardman Bay Master, Ltd.

September 23, 2015September 24, 2015
773
Boart Longyear Limited

June 24, 2013June 25, 2013
774
Bobst North America Inc.

June 18, 2013June 18, 2013
775
Bocage Capital, LLC

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
776
Boeing Capital Corporation

September 04, 2013September 04, 2013
777
Boeing Employees' Credit Union

February 23, 2015February 24, 2015
778
BOF Holdings II, LLC

November 13, 2013November 14, 2013
779
BOF Holdings III, L.P.

November 13, 2013November 14, 2013
780
Bogle Investment Management, L.P.

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
781
Boise Paper Holdings, L.L.C.

June 17, 2013June 18, 2013
782
BOKF National Association

May 31, 2013May 31, 2013
783
Bolle Australia Pty Ltd

October 14, 2016October 14, 2016
784
Bollman Hat Company

June 10, 2013June 11, 2013
785
Bolton Capital Partners I, LLC

July 01, 2013July 01, 2013
786
Bombardier (Malaysia) Sdn. Bhd.

April 10, 2015April 10, 2015
787
Bombardier Aerospace Short Executive Benefits Scheme

December 12, 2013December 12, 2013
788
Bombardier Inc.

May 13, 2014May 13, 2014
789
Bombardier Transportation (Shared Services) Philippines, Inc.

November 05, 2014November 05, 2014
790
Bombardier Transportation Financial Services S.à r.l., Munsbach, Zurich Branch

June 11, 2014June 11, 2014
791
Bombardier Transportation India Private Limited

November 07, 2014November 07, 2014
792
Bombardier Transportation Signal (Thailand) Ltd.

November 05, 2014November 05, 2014
793
Bombardier Transportation UK 2003 Pension Scheme

December 12, 2013December 12, 2013
794
Bombardier Transportation UK Pension Scheme

December 12, 2013December 12, 2013
795
Bombardier Transportation UK Vice-Presidents Pension Scheme

December 12, 2013December 12, 2013
796
Bombardier Trust (Canada) Global Equities Fund

October 25, 2013October 25, 2013
797
Bombardier Trust (Canada) Real Return Assets Fund

October 25, 2013October 25, 2013
798
Bombardier Trust (UK) Common Investment Fund

October 25, 2013October 25, 2013
799
Bon L Manufacturing Corporation

March 25, 2015March 25, 2015
800
Bon Secours Health System, Inc.

May 01, 2013May 01, 2013
801
Bonanza Creek Energy, Inc.

May 31, 2013May 31, 2013
802
Boodell & Company Capital Management, LLC

June 04, 2013June 04, 2013
803
Boodell Value Capital Master Fund LP

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
804
Booking.com B.V.

May 16, 2014May 16, 2014
805
Bool Partners Limited Partnership

July 01, 2014July 01, 2014
806
BOONES FERRY ROAD APARTMENTS INVESTORS LLC

June 18, 2015June 18, 2015
807
Boose Aluminum Foundry Co, Inc.

August 01, 2013August 01, 2013
808
Boose Properties, LP

August 01, 2013August 01, 2013
809
Boothbay Fund Management

June 13, 2013June 13, 2013
810
Booz & Company (M.E.) LTD

March 20, 2014March 21, 2014
811
Booz & Company Inc.

March 19, 2014March 19, 2014
812
Booz Allen Hamilton Inc.

October 15, 2014October 16, 2014
813
Boral Limited

February 16, 2014February 17, 2014
814
Borden Dairy Company

February 12, 2015February 12, 2015
815
BorgWarner Automotive Components (Jiangsu) Co. Ltd.

March 26, 2015March 26, 2015
816
BorgWarner Automotive Components (Ningbo) Co., Ltd.

October 09, 2013October 10, 2013
817
BorgWarner Cooling Systems GmbH

October 24, 2014October 24, 2014
818
BorgWarner Inc.

May 23, 2013May 23, 2013
819
BorgWarner IT Services Europe GmbH

December 05, 2016December 05, 2016
820
BorgWarner Limited

May 23, 2013May 23, 2013
821
BorgWarner Morse TEC Mexico S.A. de C.V.

October 15, 2014October 15, 2014
822
BorgWarner Oroszlany, Kft.

December 22, 2016December 22, 2016
823
BorgWarner Poland Sp. z o.o.

May 23, 2013May 23, 2013
824
BorgWarner Shenglong (Ningbo) Co. Ltd.

March 16, 2015March 17, 2015
825
BorgWarner TorqTransfer Systems AB

February 09, 2015February 09, 2015
826
BorgWarner Transmissions Systems GmbH

April 24, 2017April 24, 2017
827
BorgWarner TTS S. de R.L. de C.V.

February 09, 2015February 09, 2015
828
BorgWarner Turbo Systems GmbH

October 24, 2014October 24, 2014
829
BorgWarner Turbo Systems Worldwide Headquarters GmbH

February 02, 2017February 02, 2017
830
Bose Corporation

June 07, 2013June 07, 2013
831
Bose GP

June 07, 2013June 07, 2013
832
Bose Products BV

January 23, 2017January 23, 2017
833
Boston Gas Company

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
834
Boston Management & Research

June 17, 2013June 17, 2013
835
Boston Partners Global Investors, Inc. acting as agent for JNL Series Trust – JNL Multi-Manager Alternative Fund

March 08, 2017March 08, 2017
836
Boston Partners Global Investors, Inc. as Investment Adviser to Columbia Funds Series Trust I - Active Portfolios Multi-Manager Directional Alternatives Fund

September 27, 2016October 12, 2015
837
Boston Patriot 2014 DMA LLC

December 11, 2014December 11, 2014
838
Boston Piano GmbH

March 23, 2015March 23, 2015
839
Boston Private Bank & Trust Company

June 07, 2013June 07, 2013
840
Boston Properties Limited Partnership, By: Boston Properties, Inc., its general partner

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
841
Boston Properties, Inc.

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
842
Boston Provident, LP

October 14, 2013October 15, 2013
843
Boston Scientific Asia Pacific Pte. Ltd.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
844
Boston Scientific Clonmel Limited

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
845
Boston Scientific Corporation

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
846
Boston Scientific Far East B.V.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
847
Boston Scientific International B.V.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
848
Boston Scientific International Finance Limited

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
849
Boston Scientific Pty. Ltd.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
850
Botanical Food Company Pty Ltd

March 25, 2015March 25, 2015
851
Bottling Group Financing, LLC

June 05, 2013June 05, 2013
852
Bottling Group, LLC

June 06, 2013June 06, 2013
853
Boulder Brands USA, Inc. (formerly known as GFA Brands, Inc.)

February 06, 2015February 06, 2015
854
Boulder Community Health

March 15, 2016March 16, 2016
855
Boulder Creek Company, LLC

August 30, 2013September 03, 2013
856
Bourns Asia Pacific Pte., Ltd.

October 15, 2014October 16, 2014
857
Bourns, Inc.

July 24, 2013July 24, 2013
858
Bow Street Master Fund, LP

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
859
Bow Street Special Opportunities Fund A, LP

August 22, 2016August 22, 2016
860
Bowery Investment Management, LLC

June 25, 2013June 26, 2013
861
Bowie Capital Management, LLC

April 29, 2015April 29, 2015
862
Bowie Coal Sales LLC

January 13, 2015January 13, 2015
863
Bowne International Ltd

April 22, 2013April 22, 2013
864
Bowne LLC

February 24, 2016February 24, 2016
865
Box.com (UK) Ltd.

April 30, 2015May 01, 2015
866
Boyne Valley B.V.

June 24, 2013June 25, 2013
867
BP Energy Company

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
868
BP Gas Marketing Limited

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
869
BP International Limited

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
870
BP Master Fund, LP

October 14, 2013October 15, 2013
871
BP Oil International Limited

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
872
BP Products North America Inc.

June 04, 2014June 04, 2014
873
BP SINGAPORE PTE. LIMITED

June 27, 2013June 28, 2013
874
BPA II, Ltd.

July 02, 2013July 02, 2013
875
BPER International SICAV

June 28, 2013June 28, 2013
876
BPG Investment Partnership IX, L.P.

July 10, 2014July 10, 2014
877
BPMW LLC

July 03, 2013July 04, 2013
878
BPP Europe Holdings L.P.

June 28, 2016June 28, 2016
879
BPY Bermuda Holdings IV Limited

June 08, 2016June 08, 2016
880
BPY Bermuda Holdings Limited

January 14, 2014January 14, 2014
881
BR MAC Cayman Fund Limited

April 28, 2014April 28, 2014
882
BR T&C BLVD., LLC

July 10, 2015July 10, 2015
883
Bradford & Marzec, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
884
Bradken (Xuzhou) International Trading Co., Limited

February 26, 2017February 27, 2017
885
Bradken (Xuzhou) Metal Equipment Manufacturing Co., Limited

February 26, 2017February 27, 2017
886
Bradken Finance Pty Limited

September 30, 2014September 30, 2014
887
Bradken Resources Pty Limited

September 30, 2014September 30, 2014
888
Bradken Resources Pty Ltd

February 06, 2014February 07, 2014
889
Bradley Corporation

August 19, 2013August 20, 2013
890
Bradshaw International Parent Corp

July 31, 2013July 31, 2013
891
Bradshaw International, Inc.

November 04, 2013November 04, 2013
892
BRADWELL COMMERCIAL LTD.

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
893
Brady Corporation

October 23, 2013October 23, 2013
894
Brady Corporation Asia Pte. Ltd.

January 08, 2014January 08, 2014
895
Brady Sullivan Southside Manor, LLC

December 09, 2014December 09, 2014
896
Brahma India Fund Mauritius

August 05, 2013August 06, 2013
897
BRAHMAN CAPITAL CORP.

June 18, 2013June 18, 2013
898
Brake Parts Inc LLC

January 07, 2015January 07, 2015
899
BRAM Bradesco Asset Management SA DTVM 

November 22, 2016November 22, 2016
900
Brambles Finance Limited

March 11, 2014March 12, 2014
901
BRAMBLES FINANCE PLC

March 20, 2014March 20, 2014
902
Brambles USA, Inc.

July 21, 2014July 21, 2014
903
Branch Banking and Trust Company

June 28, 2013June 28, 2013
904
Brand Energy and Infrastructure Services, Inc.

March 12, 2014March 12, 2014
905
Brand Energy Holdings bv formerly known as Harsco Nederland bv

July 24, 2014July 24, 2014
906
Brandbev sarl

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
907
Brandbrew SA

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
908
Brandywine Global Investment Management, LLC

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
909
Brandywine Housing, Ltd.

October 03, 2014October 03, 2014
910
Brandywine Operating Partnership

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
911
Brandywine Property Partnership

December 23, 2014December 23, 2014
912
Brandywine Realty Trust

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
913
Brandywine Transportation Inc.

May 01, 2017May 01, 2017
914
Braskem America, Inc.

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
915
Braskem Europe GmbH

June 23, 2015June 24, 2015
916
Braskem Idesa S.A.P.I.

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
917
Braskem Incorporated Limited

February 05, 2014February 05, 2014
918
Braskem Netherlands B.V

June 23, 2015June 24, 2015
919
Bratton Capital Management, L.P.

July 18, 2013July 18, 2013
920
Brava Star Ltd

July 22, 2014July 22, 2014
921
Bravo Natural Resources

October 22, 2014October 22, 2014
922
Brax Equity Fund SPC on behalf of Long Biased Segregated Portfolio

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
923
Brax Fund

June 19, 2013June 19, 2013
924
Bray International, Inc.

May 08, 2015May 08, 2015
925
Bray International, Inc.

October 19, 2015October 19, 2015
926
Brayton Point Energy, LLC

September 09, 2013September 10, 2013
927
Brazeway Incorporated

June 05, 2013June 05, 2013
928
BRCP 1390 Market, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
929
BRCP 2701 Ocean, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
930
BRCP 465 Halstead, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
931
BRCP Aurora Marketplace, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
932
BRCP Grace Court, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
933
BRCP Greenwood Corporate Plaza, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
934
BRCP Oasis Land PTY LTD

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
935
BRCP Stevenson Point, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
936
BRCP Sunset, LLC

June 26, 2013June 27, 2013
937
BRE / Europe France Hotel Holding 1 SAS

January 27, 2014January 27, 2014
938
BRE Colombia Hydro Investments Limited

August 25, 2016August 25, 2016
939
Brecknell Willis & Co., Ltd

December 07, 2015December 08, 2015
940
Brecknell Willis Composites Ltd.

December 07, 2015December 08, 2015
941
BRED BANQUE POPULAIRE

June 10, 2013June 11, 2013
942
BREDS Europe I Holdings NQ L.P.

September 09, 2015September 10, 2015
943
BREDS III SD NQ L.L.C.

January 06, 2017January 09, 2017
944
BREDS III SD NQ-II L.L.C.

January 25, 2017January 25, 2017
945
BreitBurn Operating L.P., By:  BreitBurn Operating GP, LLC, its general partner

June 11, 2013June 12, 2013
946
BREMBO NORTH AMERICA INC

June 27, 2013June 27, 2013
947
Bremer Bank, N.A.

August 21, 2013August 21, 2013
948
Bremer Bank, N.A.

February 20, 2014February 20, 2014
949
Bremer Landesbank Kreditanstalt Oldenburg - Girozentrale -

July 10, 2013July 10, 2013
950
Brendan McAllister

July 31, 2014July 31, 2014
951
Brendan Spring Glen NavCapMan LLC

August 25, 2014August 26, 2014
952
Brenner West Capital Master Fund, Ltd.

June 28, 2013June 28, 2013
953
Brenner West Capital Partners, LP

June 28, 2013June 28, 2013
954
Brenntag Latin America, Inc.

March 25, 2015March 26, 2015
955
Brent Bossart

June 17, 2013June 17, 2013
956
BREP VIII Cayman Super Holding (NQ) L.P.

June 22, 2015June 23, 2015
957
BREP VIII Cayman Super Holding BR L.P.

September 10, 2015September 10, 2015
958
Brevan Howard AH Master Fund Limited

February 06, 2017February 06, 2017
959
Brevan Howard Argentina Master Fund Limited

July 23, 2015July 23, 2015
960
Brevan Howard CMBS Master Fund Limited

September 20, 2013September 20, 2013
961
Brevan Howard Diversified Strategies (Cayman) Master Fund Limited

July 05, 2017July 05, 2017
962
Brevan Howard Securitized Products Master Fund Limited

October 03, 2016October 03, 2016
963
Brevan Howard Strategic Macro Master Fund Limited

September 20, 2013September 20, 2013
964
Brewer Holdings Corp.

December 13, 2013December 16, 2013
965
BRG Holding Company Inc

June 09, 2016June 10, 2016
966
BRIAN, CRIS, DANA & ZANE TARANTO LLC

May 29, 2013May 31, 2013
967
Briarwood Chase Management LLC

February 16, 2017February 16, 2017
968
Brice Grove Apartments, LLC

September 16, 2013September 17, 2013
969
Brickman Group Holdings, Inc.

November 14, 2013November 14, 2013
970
Bridge Bank, N.A.

June 25, 2013June 25, 2013
971
Bridge Energy LLC

July 06, 2017July 07, 2017
972
BRIDGE STREET 2011 OFFSHORE, L.P. BY:      Bridge Street 2011 Offshore Advisors, Inc., its General Partner

August 28, 2015August 28, 2015
973
BRIDGE STREET 2011, L.P. BY:      Bridge Street 2011 Advisors, L.L.C., its General Partner

August 28, 2015August 28, 2015
974
Bridge Street 2012 Holdings, L.P.

December 06, 2013December 06, 2013
975
Bridge Street 2012 Offshore, L.P.

June 10, 2013June 14, 2013
976
Bridge Street 2012, L.P.

June 10, 2013June 14, 2013
977
BRIDGE STREET 2013 HOLDINGS, L.P.

June 10, 2013June 14, 2013
978
Bridge Street 2013 Holdings, L.P.

December 06, 2013December 06, 2013
979
BRIDGE STREET 2013 OFFSHORE, L.P.

June 10, 2013June 14, 2013
980
Bridge Street 2013 Offshore, L.P.

July 29, 2013July 29, 2013
981
BRIDGE STREET 2013, L.P.

June 10, 2013June 14, 2013
982
BRIDGE STREET 2013, L.P.

July 29, 2013July 29, 2013
983
Bridge Street 2014 Holdings, L.P.

February 26, 2014February 26, 2014
984
Bridge Street 2014, L.P.

June 20, 2014June 20, 2014
985
BRIDGE STREET 2015, L.P. By: Bridge Street Opportunity Advisors, L.L.C., its general partner

May 21, 2015May 22, 2015
986
BRIDGE STREET 2016, L.P. By: Bridge Street Opportunity Advisors, L.L.C., its general partner

May 31, 2016June 01, 2016
987
Bridge Street Plaza, LLC

November 03, 2014November 03, 2014
988
Bridger Management, LLC

June 26, 2013June 26, 2013
989
Bridgestone Americas, Inc.

September 03, 2015September 04, 2015
990
Bridgestone Corporation

January 23, 2014January 23, 2014
991
Bridgewater Associates, LP

June 11, 2013June 11, 2013
992
Bridgewater MAC 10 Ltd.

June 14, 2013June 14, 2013
993
Brigade Capital Management LLC

June 13, 2013June 13, 2013
994
Briggs & Stratton AG

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
995
Briggs & Stratton Australia Pty. Limited

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
996
Briggs & Stratton Corporation

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
997
Briggs & Stratton International AG

September 08, 2015September 08, 2015
998
Briggs & Stratton Power Products Group, LLC

June 24, 2013June 24, 2013
999
Briggs & Stratton Retirement Trust

August 20, 2013August 20, 2013
1000
Brightlight Capital Partners LP

March 17, 2016March 18, 2016









<<
<
1
2
3
>
>>





*
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z



back to top





Protocol Selection


You have selected to adhere to the "". Click Proceed to continue or
			Back to choose a different protocol.


Back
Proceed










Functional Areas

Legal

Public Policy

Risk Management

Infrastructure Management

Research

Accounting

Protocol Management

Data, Reporting and FpML



Asset Classes

Credit Derivatives/CDS

Equity Derivatives

Interest Rates Derivatives

FX Derivatives

Energy, Commodities

Structured Products and Other



Regions

Asia-Pacific

Canada

CEE, Middle East, Africa

Europe

Japan

Latin America

United States



Committees

Global Policy

Legal

Capital, Risk, Margin and Collateral

Market Infrastructure and Technology (MIT)

Clearing

Data

Trading

ISDA WGMR Implementation Initiative

Determinations Committees



Conferences

Conference Schedule

Accreditation

ISDA On Demand

ISDA AGM

2017 ISDA Regional Conferences



Newsroom

Press Releases

Webcasts / Videos

derivatiViews

media.comment

dailyLead

ISDA In Review

Speeches & Presentations

Media  Contacts



About ISDA

About ISDA

Board of Directors

Executives

Mission Statement

Contact Us









				©2017
				International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc. ISDA is a registered trademark of the International Swaps and Derivatives Association, Inc.
Privacy policy








Login


 

Username / Email





Password





Remember me








Forgot password | Create account

Cancel
Log in




Reset Password


 

Username / Email








Log in | Create account

Cancel
Reset Password




Create New Account


 

Business email






Password





Confirm Password







Company *





Title *





Prefix





First Name *





Middle Name





Last Name *





Suffix





Telephone *





Fax







Address *



 



 





City *





Country *





State/Province





Postal Code *








Log in | Forgot password

Cancel
Back
Continue




Activate Account




Activate







Continue to site
Resend
Activate











Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









